New Jersey, session 221, S2949.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.43:21-3 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-3. Benefits. (a)   Payment of benefits. All benefits shall be promptly paid from the fund in accordance with such regulations as may be prescribed hereunder. (b)   Weekly benefits for unemployment. With respect to an individual's benefit year commencing on or after July 1, 1961, such individual, if eligible and unemployed (as defined in subsection (m) of R.S.43:21-19), shall be paid an amount (except as to final payment) equal to his weekly benefit rate less any remuneration, other than remuneration from self-employment paid to an individual who is receiving a self-employment assistance allowance, paid or payable to him for such week in excess of 20% of his weekly benefit rate (fractional part of a dollar omitted) or $5.00, whichever is the greater; provided that such amount shall be computed to the next lower multiple of $1.00 if not already a multiple thereof. (c)   Weekly benefit rate. (1)   With respect to an individual whose benefit year commences after September 30, 1984, his weekly benefit rate under each determination shall be 60% of his average weekly wage, subject to a maximum of 56 2/3 % of the Statewide average weekly remuneration paid to workers by employers subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), as determined and promulgated by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development; provided, however, that such individual's weekly benefit rate shall be computed to the next lower multiple of $1.00 if not already a multiple thereof. (2)   Dependency benefits. (A)  With respect to an individual whose benefit year commences after September 30, 1984, the individual's weekly benefit rate as determined in paragraph (1) of this subsection (c) will be increased by 7% for the first dependent and 4% each for the next two dependents (up to a maximum of three dependents), computed to the next lower multiple of $1.00 if not already a multiple thereof, except that the maximum weekly benefit rate payable for an individual claiming dependency benefits shall not exceed the maximum amount determined under paragraph (1) of this subsection (c). (B)  For the purposes of this paragraph (2), a dependent is defined as an individual's unemployed spouse or an unemployed unmarried child (including a stepchild or a legally adopted child) under the age of 19 [or], an unemployed unmarried child, who is attending an educational institution as defined in subsection (y) of R.S.43:21-19 on a full-time basis and is under the age of 22, or an unemployed unmarried disabled adult child who has blindness or a disability which began before the age of 22. The burden of proof shall be on the claimant to establish that an individual is a dependent, as that term is defined in this subparagraph (B). For the purpose of this subparagraph (B), blindness or disability shall be determined using the standard set forth within 20 C.F.R. Part 404, Subpart P, which is used by the Social Security Administration to determine disability and blindness when evaluating eligibility for Disabled Adult Child benefits under the Social Security Act. For the purpose of determining under this subparagraph (B) whether an individual is a dependent, because the individual is an adult child who has blindness or a disability which began before the age of 22, written proof of a determination by the Social Security Administration that the individual is currently eligible for Disabled Adult Child benefits under the Social Security Act shall be considered conclusive proof of dependent status.  If an individual's spouse is employed during the week the individual files an initial claim for benefits, this paragraph (2) shall not apply. If both spouses establish a claim for benefits in accordance with the provisions of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), only one shall be entitled to dependency benefits as provided in this paragraph (2). (C)  Any determination establishing dependency benefits under this paragraph (2) shall remain fixed for the duration of the individual's benefit year and shall not be increased or decreased unless it is determined by the division that the individual wrongfully claimed dependency benefits as a result of false or fraudulent representation. (D)  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the division shall use every available administrative means to insure that dependency benefits are paid only to individuals who meet the requirements of this paragraph (2).  These administrative actions may include, but shall not be limited to, the following: (i)    All married individuals claiming dependents under this paragraph (2) shall be required to provide the social security number of the individual's spouse.  If the individual indicates that the spouse is unemployed, the division shall match the social security number of the spouse against available wage records to determine whether earnings were reported on the last quarterly earnings report filed by employers under R.S.43:21-14.  If earnings were reported, the division shall contact in writing the last employer to determine whether the spouse is currently employed. (ii) Where a child is claimed as a dependent by an individual under this paragraph (2), the individual shall be required to provide to the division the most recent federal income tax return filed by the individual to assist the division in verifying the claim. (3)   For the purposes of this subsection (c), the "Statewide average weekly remuneration paid to workers by employers" shall be computed and determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development on or before September 1 of each year on the basis of one-fifty-second of the total remuneration reported for the preceding calendar year by employers subject to this chapter, divided by the average of the number of workers reported by such employers, and shall be effective as to benefit determinations in the calendar year following such computation and determination. (d)   Maximum total benefits. (1)  (A)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2003, c.107). (B)  (i)  With respect to an individual for whom benefits shall be payable for benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 1986, and before July 1, 2003 as provided in this section, the individual shall be entitled to receive a total amount of benefits equal to three-quarters of the individual's base weeks with all employers in the base year multiplied by the individual's weekly benefit rate; but the amount of benefits thus resulting under that determination shall be adjusted to the next lower multiple of $1.00 if not already a multiple thereof.  With respect to an individual for whom benefits shall be payable for benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 2003 as provided in this section, the individual shall be entitled to receive a total amount of benefits equal to the number of the individual's base weeks with all employers in the base year multiplied by the individual's weekly benefit rate; but the amount of benefits thus resulting under that determination shall be adjusted to the next lower multiple of $1.00 if not already a multiple thereof. (ii)  Except as provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-7, benefits paid to an individual for benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 1986 shall be charged against the accounts of the individual's base year employers in the following manner: Each week of benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged against each base year employer's account in the same proportion that the wages paid by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the wages paid by all employers to that individual during the base year. (iii)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1997, c.255.) (2)   No such individual shall be entitled to receive benefits under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) in excess of 26 times his weekly benefit rate in any benefit year under either of subsections (c) and (f) of R.S. 43:21-4.  In the event that any individual qualifies for benefits under both of said subsections during any benefit year, the maximum total amount of benefits payable under said subsections combined to such individual during the benefit year shall be one and one-half times the maximum amount of benefits payable under one of said subsections. (3)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1984, c.24.) (cf: P.L.2004, c.45, s.1) 2.    R.S.43:21-4 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-4.  Benefit eligibility conditions. An unemployed individual shall be eligible to receive benefits with respect to any week eligible only if: (a)   The individual has filed a claim at an unemployment insurance claims office and thereafter continues to report at an employment service office or unemployment insurance claims office, as directed by the division in accordance with such regulations as the division may prescribe, except that the division may, by regulation, waive or alter either or both of the requirements of this subsection as to individuals attached to regular jobs, and as to such other types of cases or situations with respect to which the division finds that compliance with such requirements would be oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the purpose of this act; provided that no such regulation shall conflict with subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-3. (b)   The individual has made a claim for benefits in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-6. (c) (1) The individual is able to work, and is available for work, and has demonstrated to be actively seeking work, except as hereinafter provided in this subsection or in subsection (f) of this section. (2)   The director may modify the requirement of actively seeking work if such modification of this requirement is warranted by economic conditions. (3)   No individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall be deemed ineligible, or unavailable for work, because the individual is on vacation, without pay, during said week, if said vacation is not the result of the individual's own action as distinguished from any collective action of a collective bargaining agent or other action beyond the individual's control. (4)  (A)  Subject to such limitations and conditions as the division may prescribe, an individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible because the individual is attending a training program approved for the individual by the division to enhance the individual's employment opportunities or because the individual failed or refused to accept work while attending such program. (B)  For the purpose of this paragraph (4), any training program shall be regarded as approved by the division for the individual if the program and the individual meet the following requirements: (i)    The training is for a labor demand occupation and is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power, except that the training may be for an occupation other than a labor demand occupation if the individual is receiving short-time benefits pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2011, c.154 (C.43:21-20.3 et al.) and the training is necessary to prevent a likely loss of jobs; (ii)   The training is provided by a competent and reliable private or public entity approved by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to the provisions of section 8 of the "1992 New Jersey Employment and Workforce Development Act," P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-8); (iii)  The individual can reasonably be expected to complete the program, either during or after the period of benefits; (iv)  The training does not include on the job training or other training under which the individual is paid by an employer for work performed by the individual during the time that the individual receives benefits; and (v)   The individual enrolls in vocational training, remedial education or a combination of both on a full-time basis, except that the training or education may be on a part-time basis if the individual is receiving short-time benefits pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2011, c.154 (C.43:21-20.3 et al.). (C)  If the requirements of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (4) are met, the division shall not withhold approval of the training program for the individual for any of the following reasons: (i)    The training includes remedial basic skills education necessary for the individual to successfully complete the vocational component of the training; (ii)   The training is provided in connection with a program under which the individual may obtain a college degree, including a post-graduate degree; (iii)  The length of the training period under the program; or (iv)  The lack of a prior guarantee of employment upon completion of the training. (D)  For the purpose of this paragraph (4), "labor demand occupation" means an occupation for which there is or is likely to be an excess of demand over supply for adequately trained workers, including, but not limited to, an occupation designated as a labor demand occupation by the Center for Occupational Employment Information pursuant to the provisions of subsection d. of section 27 of P.L.2005, c.354 (C.34:1A-86). (5)   An unemployed individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible solely by reason of the individual's attendance before a court in response to a summons for service on a jury. (6)   An unemployed individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible solely by reason of the individual's attendance at the funeral of an immediate family member, provided that the duration of the attendance does not extend beyond a two-day period. For purposes of this paragraph, "immediate family member" includes any of the following individuals: father, mother, mother-in-law, father-in-law, grandmother, grandfather, grandchild, spouse, child, child placed by the Division of Youth and Family Services in the Department of Children and Families, sister or brother of the unemployed individual and any relatives of the unemployed individual residing in the unemployed individual's household. (7)   No individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall be deemed ineligible or unavailable for work with respect to any week because, during that week, the individual fails or refuses to accept work while the individual is participating on a full-time basis in self-employment assistance activities authorized by the division, whether or not the individual is receiving a self-employment allowance during that week. (8)   Any individual who is determined to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and need reemployment services based on information obtained by the worker profiling system shall not be eligible to receive benefits if the individual fails to participate in available reemployment services to which the individual is referred by the division or in similar services, unless the division determines that: (A)  The individual has completed the reemployment services; or (B)  There is justifiable cause for the failure to participate, which shall include participation in employment and training, self-employment assistance activities or other activities authorized by the division to assist reemployment or enhance the marketable skills and earning power of the individual and which shall include any other circumstance indicated pursuant to this section in which an individual is not required to be available for and actively seeking work to receive benefits. (9)   An unemployed individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible solely by reason of the individual's work as a board worker for a county board of elections on an election day. (10) An individual who is employed by a shared work employer and is otherwise eligible for benefits shall not be deemed ineligible for short-time benefits because the individual is unavailable for work with employers other than the shared work employer, so long as: (A)  The individual is able to work and is available to work the individual's normal full-time hours for the shared work employer; or (B)  The individual is attending a training program which is in compliance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of this section and the agreements and certifications required pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2011, c.154 (C.43:21-20.4). (11)  An unemployed individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible solely because the individual is a student in full-time attendance at, or on vacation from, an educational institution, as defined in subsection (y) of R.S. 43:21-19; provided that the unemployed individuals full-time attendance at the educational institution does not, in fact, result in the unemployed individual being unable to work or being unavailable for work, and provided that notwithstanding the unemployed individuals full-time attendance at the educational institution, the unemployed individual is able to demonstrate that the individual is actively seeking work. (12)  An unemployed individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible solely because the individual is attending a training program approved by the division to enhance the individual's employment opportunities, in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of R.S. 43:21-4. (d)   With respect to any benefit year commencing before January 1, 2002, the individual has been totally or partially unemployed for a waiting period of one week in the benefit year which includes that week. When benefits become payable with respect to the third consecutive week next following the waiting period, the individual shall be eligible to receive benefits as appropriate with respect to the waiting period.  No week shall be counted as a week of unemployment for the purposes of this subsection: (1)   If benefits have been paid, or are payable with respect thereto; provided that the requirements of this paragraph shall be waived with respect to any benefits paid or payable for a waiting period as provided in this subsection; (2)   If it has constituted a waiting period week under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.); (3)   Unless the individual fulfills the requirements of subsections (a) and (c) of this section; (4)   If with respect thereto, claimant was disqualified for benefits in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-5. The waiting period provided by this subsection shall not apply to benefit years commencing on or after January 1, 2002.  An individual whose total benefit amount was reduced by the application of the waiting period to a claim which occurred on or after January 1, 2002 and before the effective date of P.L.2002, c.13, shall be permitted to file a claim for the additional benefits attributable to the waiting period in the form and manner prescribed by the division, but not later than the 180th day following the effective date of P.L.2002, c.13 unless the division determines that there is good cause for a later filing. (e)  (1)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2001, c.17). (2)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.17). (3)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.17). (4)   With respect to benefit years commencing on or after January 7, 2001, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, the individual has, during his base year as defined in subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-19: (A)  Established at least 20 base weeks as defined in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (t) of R.S.43:21-19; or (B)  If the individual has not met the requirements of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (4), earned remuneration not less than an amount 1,000 times the minimum wage in effect pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4) on October 1 of the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the benefit year commences, which amount shall be adjusted to the next higher multiple of $100 if not already a multiple thereof. (5)   With respect to benefit years commencing on or after January 7, 2001, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (4) of this subsection, an unemployed individual claiming benefits on the basis of service performed in the production and harvesting of agricultural crops shall, subject to the limitations of subsection (i) of R.S.43:21-19, be eligible to receive benefits if during his base year, as defined in subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-19, the individual: (A)  Has established at least 20 base weeks as defined in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (t) of R.S.43:21-19; or (B)  Has earned remuneration not less than an amount 1,000 times the minimum wage in effect pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4) on October 1 of the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the benefit year commences, which amount shall be adjusted to the next higher multiple of $100 if not already a multiple thereof; or (C)  Has performed at least 770 hours of service in the production and harvesting of agricultural crops. (6)   The individual applying for benefits in any successive benefit year has earned at least six times his previous weekly benefit amount and has had four weeks of employment since the beginning of the immediately preceding benefit year.  This provision shall be in addition to the earnings requirements specified in paragraph (4) or (5) of this subsection, as applicable. (f)  (1)  The individual has suffered any accident or sickness not compensable under the workers' compensation law, R.S.34:15-1 et seq. and resulting in the individual's total disability to perform any work for remuneration, and would be eligible to receive benefits under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) (without regard to the maximum amount of benefits payable during any benefit year) except for the inability to work and has furnished notice and proof of claim to the division, in accordance with its rules and regulations, and payment is not precluded by the provisions of R.S.43:21-3(d); provided, however, that benefits paid under this subsection (f) shall be computed on the basis of only those base year wages earned by the claimant as a "covered individual," as defined in subsection (b) of section 3 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27); provided further that no benefits shall be payable under this subsection to any individual: (A)  For any period during which such individual is not under the care of a legally licensed physician, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist, practicing psychologist, advanced practice nurse, or chiropractor, who, when requested by the division, shall certify within the scope of the practitioner's practice, the disability of the individual, the probable duration thereof, and, where applicable, the medical facts within the practitioner's knowledge; (B)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1980, c.90.) (C)  For any period of disability due to willfully or intentionally self-inflicted injury, or to injuries sustained in the perpetration by the individual of a crime of the first, second or third degree; (D)  For any week with respect to which or a part of which the individual has received or is seeking benefits under any unemployment compensation or disability benefits law of any other state or of the United States; provided that if the appropriate agency of such other state or the United States finally determines that the individual is not entitled to such benefits, this disqualification shall not apply; (E)  For any week with respect to which or part of which the individual has received or is seeking disability benefits under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.); (F)   For any period of disability commencing while such individual is a "covered individual," as defined in subsection (b) of section 3 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27). (2)   The individual is taking family temporary disability leave to provide care for a family member with a serious health condition or to be with a child during the first 12 months after the child's birth or placement of the child for adoption or as a foster child with the individual, and the individual would be eligible to receive benefits under R.S.43:21-1 et seq. (without regard to the maximum amount of benefits payable during any benefit year) except for the individual's unavailability for work while taking the family temporary disability leave, and the individual has furnished notice and proof of claim to the division, in accordance with its rules and regulations, and payment is not precluded by the provisions of R.S.43:21-3(d) provided, however, that benefits paid under this subsection (f) shall be computed on the basis of only those base year wages earned by the claimant as a "covered individual," as defined in subsection (b) of section 3 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27); provided further that no benefits shall be payable under this subsection to any individual: (A)  For any week with respect to which or a part of which the individual has received or is seeking benefits under any unemployment compensation or disability benefits law of any other state or of the United States; provided that if the appropriate agency of such other state or the United States finally determines that the individual is not entitled to such benefits, this disqualification shall not apply; (B)  For any week with respect to which or part of which the individual has received or is seeking disability benefits for a disability of the individual under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.); (C)  For any period of family temporary disability leave commencing while the individual is a "covered individual," as defined in subsection (b) of section 3 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27); or (D)  For any period of family temporary disability leave for a serious health condition of a family member of the claimant during which the family member is not receiving inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential medical care facility and is not subject to continuing medical treatment or continuing supervision by a health care provider, who, when requested by the division, shall certify within the scope of the provider's practice, the serious health condition of the family member, the probable duration thereof, and, where applicable, the medical facts within the provider's knowledge. (3)   Benefit payments under this subsection (f) shall be charged to and paid from the State disability benefits fund established by the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.), and shall not be charged to any employer account in computing any employer's experience rate for contributions payable under this chapter. (g)   Benefits based on service in employment defined in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of R.S.43:21-19 (i)(1) shall be payable in the same amount and on the terms and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to the "unemployment compensation law"; except that, notwithstanding any other provisions of the "unemployment compensation law": (1)   With respect to service performed after December 31, 1977, in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid based on such services for any week of unemployment commencing during the period between two successive academic years, or during a similar period between two regular terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's contract, to any individual if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years (or terms) and if there is a contract or a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform services in any such capacity for any educational institution in the second of such academic years or terms; (2)   With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning after September 3, 1982, on the basis of service performed in any other capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid on the basis of such services to any individual for any week which commences during a period between two successive academic years or terms if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the second of such academic years or terms, except that if benefits are denied to any individual under this paragraph (2) and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform these services for the educational institution for the second of any academic years or terms, the individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which benefits were denied solely by reason of this clause; (3)   With respect to those services described in paragraphs (1) and (2) above, benefits shall not be paid on the basis of such services to any individual for any week which commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if such individual performs such services in the period immediately before such vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the period immediately following such period or holiday recess; (4)   With respect to any services described in paragraphs (1) and (2) above, benefits shall not be paid as specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) above to any individual who performed those services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency, and for this purpose the term "educational service agency" means a governmental agency or governmental entity which is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing those services to one or more educational institutions; (5)   As used in this subsection (g) in order for there to be a "reasonable assurance" all of the following requirements shall be met: (A)  The educational institution has made an offer of employment in the following academic year or term that is either written, oral, or implied; (B)  The offer of employment in the following academic year or term was made by an individual with actual authority to offer employment; (C)  The employment offered in the following academic year or term shall be in the same capacity; (D)  The economic conditions of the employment offered may not be considerably less in the following academic year or term than in the then current academic year or term.  For the purpose of this paragraph, "considerably less" means that the claimant will earn less than 90 percent of the amount the claimant earned in the then current academic year or term; (E)  The offer of employment in the following academic year or term is not contingent upon a factor or factors that are within the educational institution's control, including but not limited to, course programming, decisions on how to allocate available funding, final course offerings, program changes, and facility availability; and (F)   Based on a totality of the circumstances, it is highly probable that there is a job available for the claimant in the following academic year or term.  If a job offer contains a contingency, primary weight should be given to the contingent nature of the offer of employment. Contingencies that are not necessarily within the educational institution's control, such as funding, enrollment and seniority, may be taken into consideration but the existence of any one contingency should not determine whether it is highly probable that there is a job available for the claimant in the following academic year or term. (6)   Determinations by the department whether claimants have a "reasonable assurance" shall be done on a case-by-case basis. (7)   Each educational institution shall provide the following to the department, in a form, including electronic form, prescribed by the commissioner, no less than 10 business days prior to the end of the academic year or term: (A)  A list of all employees who the educational institution has concluded do not have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term, along with information prescribed by the commissioner regarding each such employee, which information shall include, but not be limited to, name and social security number; and (B)  For each employee that the educational institution maintains does have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term, a statement explaining the manner in which the employee was given a reasonable assurance of employment, that is, whether it was in writing, oral, or implied, and what information about the offer, including contingencies, was communicated to the individual. (8)   The statement required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of this subsection (g) may be used by the department in its analysis under paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection (g), but it does not conclusively demonstrate that the claimant has a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term. (9)   Failure of an educational institution to provide the statement required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of this subsection (g) not less than 10 business days prior to the end of the academic year or term shall result in a rebuttable presumption that the claimant does not have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term.  This rebuttable presumption shall give rise to an inference that the claimant does not have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term, but shall not conclusively demonstrate that the claimant does not have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term. (10)  If any part of P.L.2020, c.122 is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the State or the eligibility of employers in this State for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting part of that act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act.  Rules adopted under this act shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the State or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this State. (h)   Benefits shall not be paid to any individual on the basis of any services, substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week which commences during the period between two successive sports seasons (or similar periods) if such individual performed such services in the first of such seasons (or similar periods) and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the later of such seasons (or similar periods). (i) (1) Benefits shall not be paid on the basis of services performed by an alien unless such alien is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time the services were performed and was lawfully present for the purpose of performing the services or otherwise was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed (including an alien who is lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of section 212(d)(5) (8 U.S.C. s.1182 (d)(5)) of the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. s.1101 et seq.)); provided that any modifications of the provisions of section 3304(a)(14) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (26 U.S.C. s. 3304 (a) (14)) as provided by Pub.L.94-566, which specify other conditions or other effective dates than stated herein for the denial of benefits based on services performed by aliens and which modifications are required to be implemented under State law as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, shall be deemed applicable under the provisions of this section. (2)   Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of their alien status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits. (3)   In the case of an individual whose application for benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to such individual are not payable because of alien status shall be made except upon a preponderance of the evidence. (j)    Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the director may, to the extent that it may be deemed efficient and economical, provide for consolidated administration by one or more representatives or deputies of claims made pursuant to subsection (f) of this section with those made pursuant to Article III (State plan) of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.). (cf: P.L.2020, c.122) 3.    R.S.43:21-5 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-5.  An individual shall be disqualified for benefits: (a)  For the week in which the individual has left work voluntarily without good cause attributable to such work, and for each week thereafter until the individual becomes reemployed and works eight weeks in employment, which may include employment for the federal government, and has earned in employment at least ten times the individual's weekly benefit rate, as determined in each case.  This subsection shall apply to any individual seeking unemployment benefits on the basis of employment in the production and harvesting of agricultural crops, including any individual who was employed in the production and harvesting of agricultural crops on a contract basis and who has refused an offer of continuing work with that employer following the completion of the minimum period of work required to fulfill the contract.  This subsection shall not apply to an individual who voluntarily leaves work with one employer to accept from another employer employment which commences not more than seven days after the individual leaves employment with the first employer, if the employment with the second employer has weekly hours or pay not less than the hours or pay of the employment of the first employer, except that if the individual gives notice to the first employer that the individual will leave employment on a specified date and the first employer terminates the individual before that date, the seven-day period will commence from the specified date. (b) For the week in which the individual has been suspended or discharged for misconduct connected with the work, and for the five weeks which immediately follow that week, as determined in each case. "Misconduct" means conduct which is improper, intentional, connected with the individual's work, within the individual's control, not a good faith error of judgment or discretion, and is either a deliberate refusal, without good cause, to comply with the employer's lawful and reasonable rules made known to the employee or a deliberate disregard of standards of behavior the employer has a reasonable right to expect, including reasonable safety standards and reasonable standards for a workplace free of drug and substance use. In the event the discharge should be rescinded by the employer voluntarily or as a result of mediation or arbitration, this subsection (b) shall not apply, provided, however, an individual who is restored to employment with back pay shall return any benefits received under this chapter for any week of unemployment for which the individual is subsequently compensated by the employer. If the discharge was for gross misconduct connected with the work because of the commission of an act punishable as a crime of the first, second, third or fourth degree under the "New Jersey Code of Criminal Justice," N.J.S.2C:1-1 et seq., the individual shall be disqualified in accordance with the disqualification prescribed in subsection (a) of this section and no benefit rights shall accrue to any individual based upon wages from that employer for services rendered prior to the day upon which the individual was discharged. The director shall ensure that any appeal of a determination holding the individual disqualified for gross misconduct in connection with the work shall be expeditiously processed by the appeal tribunal. To sustain disqualification from benefits because of misconduct under this subsection (b), the burden of proof is upon the employer, who shall, prior to a determination by the department of misconduct, provide written documentation demonstrating that the employee's actions constitute misconduct or gross misconduct. Nothing within this subsection (b) shall be construed to interfere with the exercise of rights protected under the "National Labor Relations Act," (29 U.S.C. s.151 et seq.) or the "New Jersey Employer-Employee Relations Act," P.L.1941, c.100 (C.34:13A-1 et seq.). (c)  If it is found that the individual has failed, without good cause, either to apply for available, suitable work when so directed by the employment office or the director or to accept suitable work when it is offered, or to return to the individual's customary self-employment (if any) when so directed by the director.  The disqualification shall continue for the week in which the failure occurred and for the three weeks which immediately follow that week, as determined: (1)  In determining whether or not any work is suitable for an individual, consideration shall be given to the degree of risk involved to health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical fitness and prior training, experience and prior earnings, the individual's length of unemployment and prospects for securing local work in the individual's customary occupation, and the distance of the available work from the individual's residence.  In the case of work in the production and harvesting of agricultural crops, the work shall be deemed to be suitable without regard to the distance of the available work from the individual's residence if all costs of transportation are provided to the individual and the terms and conditions of hire are as favorable or more favorable to the individual as the terms and conditions of the individual's base year employment. (2)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no work shall be deemed suitable and benefits shall not be denied under this chapter to any otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new work under any of the following conditions: the position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute; the remuneration, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality; or, the individual, as a condition of being employed, would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization. (d)  If it is found that this unemployment is due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment or other premises at which the individual is or was last employed, except as otherwise provided by this subsection (d). (1)  No disqualification under this subsection (d) shall apply if it is shown that: (i)  The individual is not participating in or financing or directly interested in the labor dispute which caused the stoppage of work; and (ii)  The individual does not belong to a grade or class of workers of which, immediately before the commencement of the stoppage, there were members employed at the premises at which the stoppage occurs, any of whom are participating in or financing or directly interested in the dispute; provided that if in any case in which subparagraphs (i) or (ii) of this paragraph (1) applies, separate branches of work which are commonly conducted as separate businesses in separate premises are conducted in separate departments of the same premises, each department shall, for the purpose of this subsection, be deemed to be a separate factory, establishment, or other premises. (2)  For any claim for a period of unemployment commencing on or after December 1, 2004 due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment or other premises at which the individual is or was last employed, no disqualification under this subsection (d) shall apply if it is shown that the individual has been prevented from working by the employer, even though the individual's recognized or certified majority representative has directed the employees in the individual's collective bargaining unit to work under the preexisting terms and conditions of employment, and, if the period of unemployment commenced before January 1, 2022, the employees had not engaged in a strike immediately before being prevented from working, or if the a period of unemployment commenced on or after January 1, 2022, whether or not the employees had engaged in a strike immediately before being prevented from working. (3)  For any claim for a period of unemployment commencing on or after July 1, 2018 due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment or other premises at which the individual is or was last employed, no disqualification under this subsection (d) shall apply if an issue in the labor dispute is a failure or refusal of the employer to comply with an agreement or contract between the employer and the claimant, including a collective bargaining agreement with a union representing the claimant, or a failure or refusal to comply with a State or federal law pertaining to hours, wages, or other conditions of work. (4)  For any claim for a period of unemployment commencing on or after July 1, 2018 and before January 1, 2022, if the unemployment is caused by a labor dispute, including a strike or other concerted activities of employees at the claimant's workplace, whether or not authorized or sanctioned by a union representing the claimant, but not including a dispute subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection (d), the claimant shall not be provided benefits for a period of the first 30 days following the commencement of the unemployment caused by the labor dispute, except that the period without benefits shall not apply if the employer hires a permanent replacement worker for the claimant's position.  A replacement worker shall be presumed to be permanent unless the employer certifies in writing that the claimant will be permitted to return to his or her prior position upon conclusion of the dispute.  If the employer does not permit the return, the claimant shall be entitled to recover any benefits lost as a result of the 30-day waiting period before receiving benefits, and the department may impose a penalty upon the employer of up to $750 per employee per week of benefits lost.  The penalty collected shall be paid into the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund established pursuant to subsection (g) of R.S.43:21-14.  For any claim for a period of unemployment commencing on or after January 1, 2022 due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment or other premises at which the individual is or was last employed, including a strike or other concerted activities of employees at the claimant's workplace, whether or not authorized or sanctioned by a union representing the claimant, but not including a dispute subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection (d), the claimant shall not be provided benefits for a period of the first 14 days following the commencement of the unemployment caused by the labor dispute, except that the claimant shall be provided benefits during any part of that the 14-day period in which the employer engages the services of a replacement worker for the claimant's position, whether that replacement worker is engaged on a permanent or temporary basis, or is an existing worker reassigned permanently or temporarily from other duties to perform the duties of the claimant's position.  For any claim for a period of unemployment commencing on or after January 1, 2022 which exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment or other premises at which the individual is or was last employed, if the labor dispute has not resulted in a stoppage of work, no disqualification under this subsection (d) shall apply, and the 14-day waiting period in this paragraph (4) shall not apply. (e)  For any week with respect to which the individual is receiving or has received remuneration in lieu of notice. (f)  For any week with respect to which or a part of which the individual has received or is seeking unemployment benefits under an unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the United States; provided that if the appropriate agency of the other state or of the United States finally determines that the individual is not entitled to unemployment benefits, this disqualification shall not apply. (g)  (1)  For a period of one year from the date of the discovery by the division of the illegal receipt or attempted receipt of benefits contrary to the provisions of this chapter, as the result of any false or fraudulent representation; provided that any disqualification may be appealed in the same manner as any other disqualification imposed hereunder; and provided further that a conviction in the courts of this State arising out of the illegal receipt or attempted receipt of these benefits in any proceeding instituted against the individual under the provisions of this chapter or any other law of this State shall be conclusive upon the appeals tribunal and the board of review. (2) A disqualification under this subsection shall not preclude the prosecution of any civil, criminal or administrative action or proceeding to enforce other provisions of this chapter for the assessment and collection of penalties or the refund of any amounts collected as benefits under the provisions of R.S.43:21-16, or to enforce any other law, where an individual obtains or attempts to obtain by theft or robbery or false statements or representations any money from any fund created or established under this chapter or any negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument for the payment of money from these funds, or to recover money erroneously or illegally obtained by an individual from any fund created or established under this chapter. (h)  (1)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because the individual is in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the "Trade Act of 1974," Pub.L.93-618 (19 U.S.C. s.2296 (a)(1)) nor shall the individual be denied benefits by reason of leaving work to enter this training, provided the work left is not suitable employment, or because of the application to any week in training of provisions in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), or any applicable federal unemployment compensation law, relating to availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work. (2)  For purposes of this subsection (h), the term "suitable" employment means, with respect to an individual, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the individual's past adversely affected employment, as defined for purposes of the "Trade Act of 1974," Pub.L.93-618 (19 U.S.C. s.2101 et seq.) and wages for this work at not less than 80 percent of the individual's average weekly wage, as determined for the purposes of the "Trade Act of 1974." (i)  [For benefit years commencing after June 30, 1984, for any week in which the individual is a student in full attendance at, or on vacation from, an educational institution, as defined in subsection (y) of R.S.43:21-19; except that this subsection shall not apply to any individual attending a training program approved by the division to enhance the individual's employment opportunities, as defined under subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-4; nor shall this subsection apply to any individual who, during the individual's base year, earned sufficient wages, as defined under subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-4, while attending an educational institution during periods other than established and customary vacation periods or holiday recesses at the educational institution, to establish a claim for benefits.  For purposes of this subsection, an individual shall be treated as a full-time student for any period: (1)  During which the individual is enrolled as a full-time student at an educational institution, or (2)  Which is between academic years or terms, if the individual was enrolled as a full-time student at an educational institution for the immediately preceding academic year or term.]  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.      , C.            ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (j)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits because the individual left work or was discharged due to circumstances resulting from the individual being a victim of domestic violence as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  No employer's account shall be charged for the payment of benefits to an individual who left work due to circumstances resulting from the individual being a victim of domestic violence. For the purposes of this subsection (j), the individual shall be treated as being a victim of domestic violence if the individual provides one or more of the following: (1)  A restraining order or other documentation of equitable relief issued by a court of competent jurisdiction; (2)  A police record documenting the domestic violence; (3)  Documentation that the perpetrator of the domestic violence has been convicted of one or more of the offenses enumerated in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19); (4)  Medical documentation of the domestic violence; (5)  Certification from a certified Domestic Violence Specialist or the director of a designated domestic violence agency that the individual is a victim of domestic violence; or (6)  Other documentation or certification of the domestic violence provided by a social worker, member of the clergy, shelter worker or other professional who has assisted the individual in dealing with the domestic violence. For the purposes of this subsection (j): "Certified Domestic Violence Specialist" means a person who has fulfilled the requirements of certification as a Domestic Violence Specialist established by the New Jersey Association of Domestic Violence Professionals; and "designated domestic violence agency" means a county-wide organization with a primary purpose to provide services to victims of domestic violence, and which provides services that conform to the core domestic violence services profile as defined by the Division of Child Permanency and Protection in the Department of Children and Families and is under contract with the division for the express purpose of providing such services. (k)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week in which the individual left work voluntarily and without good cause attributable to the work, if the individual left work to accompany his or her spouse who is an active member of the United States Armed Forces, as defined in N.J.S.38A:1-1(g), to a new place of residence outside the State, due to the armed forces member's transfer to a new assignment in a different geographical location outside the State, and the individual moves to the new place of residence not more than nine months after the spouse is transferred, and upon arrival at the new place of residence the individual was in all respects available for suitable work.  No employer's account shall be charged for the payment of benefits to an individual who left work under the circumstances contained in this subsection (k), except that this shall not be construed as relieving the State of New Jersey and any other governmental entity or instrumentality or nonprofit organization electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions from its responsibility to make all benefit payments otherwise required by law and from being charged for those benefits as otherwise required by law. (cf: P.L.2023, c.177, s.126) 4.    R.S.43:21-6 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-6.  (a) Filing. (1) Claims for benefits shall be made in accordance with such regulations as the Director of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey may approve.  Each employer shall post and maintain on his premises printed notices of his subject status, of such design, in such numbers and at such places as the director of the division may determine to be necessary to give notice thereof to persons in the employer's service.  Each employer shall give to each individual at the time he becomes unemployed, for any reason, whether the unemployment is permanent or temporary, a printed copy of benefit instructions.  The benefit instructions given to the individual shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: (A) the date upon which the individual becomes unemployed, and, in the case that the unemployment is temporary, to the extent possible, the date upon which the individual is expected to be recalled to work; and (B) that the individual may lose some or all of the benefits to which he is entitled if he fails to file a claim in a timely manner.  Both the aforesaid notices and instructions, including information detailing the time sensitivity of filing a claim, and directions provided in advance to all employers regarding what information the division requires employers to provide to the division by electronic means immediately upon a separation from employment sufficient to enable the division to make a benefit determination, including any information relevant to whether the individual may be disqualified pursuant to subsections (a),(b),(d), or (e) of R.S.43:21-5, shall be supplied by the division to employers without cost to them.  The directions provided to all employers in advance shall include that each employer provide the division with an email address for communications to and from the division.  When an employer provides benefit instructions to the individual which disclose the date on which unemployment will commence, the employer shall immediately and simultaneously provide by electronic means that disclosure to the division together with the information required by the division pursuant to the directions provided in advance by the division.  An employer who fails to make the immediate and simultaneous disclosure to the department as required by this paragraph shall be liable for the penalties imposed by subsection (b) of R.S.43:21-16 on employers for willful failure to furnish reports.  The division shall notify the employer by electronic means not more than seven calendar days after the department receives the disclosure of any failure of the employer to provide all of the information needed by the division to make a benefit determination.  Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to require an employer to re-hire an individual formerly in the employer's service.  Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the division to issue a benefit determination solely based on the information supplied by the employer.  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section which require employers to provide information to the division by electronic means, and the division to provide notifications to an employer by electronic means, the commissioner shall have the discretion to establish by rule an alternate method or methods for employers to provide the required information to the division and for the division to provide the required notifications to an employer in circumstances where it is established, to the satisfaction of the commissioner, that the employer is unable to provide the information to the division or is unable to receive notifications from the division by electronic means. (2)  Any claimant may choose to certify, cancel or close his claim for unemployment insurance benefits at any time, 24 hours a day and seven days a week, via the Internet on a website developed by the division; however, any claim that is certified, cancelled or closed after 7:00 PM will not be processed by the division until the next scheduled posting date. (3)  The division may request that claimants obtain digital identity credentials, but only if the division provides opportunities for claimants to verify their identities even if they do not have the knowledge or access to the equipment needed to obtain the digital identity credentials.  Any request by the division for a claimant to obtain digital identity credentials shall include a statement that the claimant may use alternative procedures to verify identification, and fully describe the alternative procedures, which shall include personal assistance in person or by phone which shall be made available by representatives of the division as needed to prevent any delay in processing claims.  If the division requests that a claimant obtain digital identity credentials, and the claimant chooses to request a digital identity credential rather than utilize an alternative procedure, but is denied the digital identity credential, the division shall issue the claimant a written appealable determination. (4)  Any system that the division establishes for claimants or recipients of benefits to verify identity, to apply for, or to make appeals regarding, benefits either by phone or on-line, shall provide a clearly and prominently expressed option for the claimant or recipient, if not immediately provided personal assistance, to select from available appointment times an appointment time to speak with a representative to obtain assistance in verifying identity, filing a claim or appeal, or obtaining information regarding the status of a claim or appeal. (b)  (1)  Procedure for making initial determinations with respect to benefit years commencing on or after January 1, 1953. A representative or representatives designated by the director of the division and hereafter referred to as a "deputy" shall promptly examine any disclosure of information to the division by an employer required by paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section upon a separation from work and any claim for benefits, and shall, by electronic means, notify the most recent employing unit and, successively as necessary, each employer in inverse chronological order during the base year.  The notification shall be made not later than seven calendar days after the employer provides to the department the disclosure required by paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section, or seven calendar days after the filing of the claim, whichever occurs first, and require said employing unit and employer to furnish, by electronic means, not more than seven calendar days after the notification is made, any information to the deputy which the employer failed to provide as required by paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section as may be necessary to determine the claimant's eligibility and his benefit rights with respect to the employer in question. The claimant shall, at the time the claim is filed, be provided any information the division has received from the employer upon the separation from work and an opportunity to respond to that information.  If a claim is filed and the employer has provided the information required upon separation from work, the employer shall immediately be notified by electronic means of the opportunity to provide, by electronic means and in not more than seven calendar days, additional information in response to the claim for benefits.  If a claim is filed and the employer has failed to provide the information required upon the separation from work, the division shall immediately, by electronic means, request the required information and the employer shall provide the information, by electronic means and in not more than seven calendar days.  The division shall provide the claimant any additional information it receives and an opportunity to respond. If any employer or employing unit fails to respond to the notification or request within seven calendar days after a communication by electronic means of the notification or request, the deputy shall rely entirely on information from other sources, including an affidavit to the best of the knowledge and belief of the claimant with respect to his wages and time worked.  Except in the event of a knowing, fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation by the claimant or his agent, if it is determined that any information in such affidavit is erroneous, no penalty shall be imposed on the claimant. The deputy shall make an initial determination contingent upon the receipt of all necessary information and notify the claimant no later than three weeks from the date on which the division received the claim for benefits.  The initial determination shall show the weekly benefit amount payable, the maximum duration of benefits with respect to the employer to whom the determination relates, and the ratio of benefits chargeable to the employer's account for benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 1986, and also shall show whether the claimant is ineligible or disqualified for benefits under the initial determination.  The employer whose account may be charged for benefits payable pursuant to said determination shall be promptly notified thereof. Whenever an initial determination is based upon information other than that supplied by an employer because such employer failed to provide information as required at the time of separation from employment, and failed to respond to the deputy's request for additional information, benefit payments based on the determination shall commence immediately, and such initial determination and any subsequent determination thereunder shall be incontestable by the noncomplying employer, as to any charges to his employer's account because of benefits paid prior to the close of the calendar week following the receipt of his reply.  Such initial determination shall be altered if necessary upon receipt of information from the employer, and any benefits paid or payable with respect to weeks occurring subsequent to the close of the calendar week following the receipt of the employer's reply and the determination of the division to alter the initial determination after providing the claimant the information and an opportunity to respond shall be paid in accordance with such altered initial determination. The deputy shall issue a separate initial benefit determination with respect to each of the claimant's base year employers, starting with the most recent employer and continuing as necessary in the inverse chronological order of the claimant's last date of employment with each such employer.  If an appeal is taken from an initial determination, as hereinafter provided, by any employer other than the first chargeable base year employer or for benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 1986, that employer from whom the individual was most recently separated, then such appeal shall be limited in scope to include only one or more of the following matters: (A)  The correctness of the benefit payments authorized to be made under the determination; (B)  Fraud in connection with the claim pursuant to which the initial determination is issued; (C)  The refusal of suitable work offered by the chargeable employer filing the appeal; (D)  Gross misconduct as provided in subsection (b) of R.S.43:21-5. In his discretion, the director may appoint special deputies to make initial or subsequent determinations under subsection (f) of R.S.43:21-4 and subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-5. The amount of benefits payable under an initial determination may be reduced or canceled if necessary to avoid payment of benefits for a number of weeks in excess of the maximum specified in subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-3. Unless the employer, within seven calendar days after a confirmed receipt of notification of an initial determination, including by electronic means, or the claimant, within 21 calendar days after the notification was mailed to the claimant's last-known address and addresses, or after the notification was delivered to the claimant by electronic means, provided the departmental functionality exists to deliver the notifications by electronic means and provided, further, that the claimant has communicated to the division the choice to receive the notifications by electronic means, files an appeal of the decision, the decision shall be final and benefits shall immediately be paid or denied in accordance therewith, except for such determinations as may be altered in benefit amounts or duration as provided in this paragraph.  An appeal concerning an initial determination shall not be filed after whichever is applicable of the seven-day or 21-day period.  Benefits payable for periods pending an appeal of the initial determination to the appeal tribunal shall be paid [as such benefits accrue and be paid] according to the initial determination, and benefits payable for periods pending appeal of the determination of the appeal tribunal to the board of review shall be paid according to the appeal tribunal determination, but shall be, to the extent that the amount paid exceeds the amount determined in the appeal, regarded as an overpayment subject to the provisions of R.S.43:21-16 regarding overpayments, including the requirement of that section that a claimant who makes knowing, fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation is liable to repay the full amount of the overpayment; provided that if the appeal is an appeal of a determination that the claimant is disqualified under the provisions of R.S.43:21-5, benefits pending determination of the appeal shall be withheld only for the period of disqualification as provided for in that section, and while the appeal is pending, the benefits otherwise provided by this act shall be paid for the period subsequent to such period of disqualification; provided further that if it is determined in the appeal that the claimant was not disqualified, the claimant shall be paid the benefits due for the period of the disqualification, except that no such benefits shall be paid to the claimant for any week during which the claimant has failed to provide to the division a weekly certification evidencing the claimant's eligibility for benefits; and provided, also, that if there are two determinations of entitlement, benefits for the period covered by such determinations shall be paid regardless of any appeal which may thereafter be taken, but no employer's account shall be charged with benefits so paid, if the decision is finally reversed.  If an employer appeals the charging of benefits to the employer's account after the seven-day period to appeal the initial benefit determination, and, as a result of the appeal on the charging to the employer's account, the division, after the claimant is notified and given the opportunity to respond, reduces the amount charged to the employer's account, any resulting reduction in the amount of benefits shall take effect only after the resolution of the appeal of the charging, and any amount of benefits paid before the resolution of the appeal of the charging which exceeds the amount determined in that appeal shall be regarded as an overpayment caused by employer error [and shall be charged to the employer's account, and the claimant shall not be liable to repay any portion of that overpayment where the overpayment is of regular Unemployment Compensation.  In the case of the recovery of an overpayment of benefit under any of the following programs authorized by the federal "Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act," Pub.L.116-136: Federal Pandemic Unemployment Compensation (FPUC), Pandemic Emergency Unemployment Compensation (PEUC), Mixed Earners Unemployment Compensation (MEUC), Pandemic Unemployment Assistance (PUA), or the first week of regular Unemployment Compensation that is reimbursed in accordance with Section 2105 of the CARES Act, a recovery shall not be waived unless the division determines that the claimant is without fault and the repayment would be contrary to equity and good conscience], the repayment of which shall be governed by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of R.S. 43:21-16. (2)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2022, c.120) (3)  Procedure for making subsequent determinations with respect to benefit years commencing on or after January 1, 1953.  The deputy shall make determinations with respect to claims for benefits thereafter in the course of the benefit year, in accordance with any initial determination allowing benefits, and under which benefits have not been exhausted, and each notification of a benefit payment shall be a notification of an affirmative subsequent determination.  Any change in the allowance, amount, or other characteristic of benefits by the deputy in any such determination, or the denial of benefits by the deputy in any such determination, shall be appealable in the same manner and under the same limitations as is provided in the case of initial determinations, except that, after an initial determination, the resolution of any appeal of the initial determination, and the payment of one or more weeks of benefits pursuant to the initial determination, if a subsequent determination will result in any termination or reduction of those benefits from the amount or duration of benefits specified in the initial determination, the claimant shall be provided notification with a full written explanation of why the reduction or termination of benefits will occur, and provided, during the seven calendar days following the notification, an opportunity to file an appeal [before the reduction or termination goes into effect]. If the claimant files an appeal during the seven-day period, benefits shall continue to be paid at the rate, and for the duration, stipulated in the initial determination until the appeal is resolved.  If the claimant does not file an appeal, or the claimant files an appeal and it is found in the resolution of the appeal that the amount in benefits paid during the processing of the appeal exceeded the amount determined in the appeal to be correct, or the claimant is found in the appeal to be ineligible for benefits, any resulting excess payment of benefits shall be regarded as an overpayment subject to the provisions of R.S.43:21-16 regarding overpayments, including the requirement of that section that a claimant who makes knowing, fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation is liable to repay the full amount of the overpayment. (c)  Appeals.  Unless such appeal is withdrawn, an appeal tribunal, after affording the parties reasonable opportunity for fair hearing, shall affirm or modify the findings of fact and the determination.  The parties shall be duly notified of such tribunal's decision, together with its reasons therefor, which shall be deemed to be the final decision of the board of review, unless further appeal is initiated pursuant to subsection (e) of this section within 20 days after the date of notification or mailing of such decision for any decision made after December 1, 2010. (d)  Appeal tribunals.  To hear and decide disputed benefit claims, including appeals from determinations with respect to demands for refunds of benefits under subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-16, the director with the approval of the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall establish impartial appeal tribunals consisting of a salaried body of examiners under the supervision of a Chief Appeals Examiner, all of whom shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes, Civil Service and other applicable statutes. (e)   Board of review.  The board of review may on its own motion affirm, modify, or set aside any decision of an appeal tribunal on the basis of the evidence previously submitted in such case, or direct the taking of additional evidence, or may permit any of the parties to such decision to initiate further appeals before it.  The board of review shall permit such further appeal by any of the parties interested in a decision of an appeal tribunal which is not unanimous and from any determination which has been overruled or modified by any appeal tribunal.  The board of review may remove to itself or transfer to another appeal tribunal the proceedings on any claim pending before an appeal tribunal.  Any proceedings so removed to the board of review shall be heard by a quorum thereof in accordance with the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.  The board of review shall promptly notify the interested parties of its findings and decision. (f)  Procedure.  The manner in which disputed benefit claims, and appeals from determinations with respect to (1) claims for benefits and (2) demands for refunds of benefits under subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-16 shall be presented, the reports thereon required from the claimant and from employers, and the conduct of hearings and appeals shall be in accordance with rules prescribed by the board of review for determining the rights of the parties, whether or not such rules conform to common law or statutory rules of evidence and other technical rules of procedure.  A full and complete record shall be kept of all proceedings in connection with a disputed claim.  All testimony at any hearing upon a disputed claim shall be recorded, but need not be transcribed unless the disputed claim is further appealed. (g)  Witness fees.  Witnesses subpoenaed pursuant to this section shall be allowed fees at a rate fixed by the director.  Such fees and all expenses of proceedings involving disputed claims shall be deemed a part of the expense of administering this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (h)  Court review.  Any decision of the board of review shall become final as to any party upon the mailing of a copy thereof to such party and to the party's attorney, or upon the mailing of a copy thereof to such party at his last-known address and to the party's attorney.  The Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance and any party to a proceeding before the board of review may secure judicial review of the final decision of the board of review.  Any party not joining in the appeal shall be made a defendant; the board of review shall be deemed to be a party to any judicial action involving the review of, or appeal from, any of its decisions, and may be represented in any such judicial action by any qualified attorney, who may be a regular salaried employee of the board of review or has been designated by it for that purpose, or, at the board of review's request, by the Attorney General. (i)  Failure to give notice. The failure of any public officer or employee at any time heretofore or hereafter to give notice of determination or decision required in subsections (b), (c) and (e) of this section, as originally passed or amended, shall not relieve any employer's account of any charge by reason of any benefits paid, unless and until that employer can show to the satisfaction of the director of the division that the said benefits, in whole or in part, would not have been charged or chargeable to his account had such notice been given.  Any determination hereunder by the director shall be subject to court review. (j)  With respect to benefit payments made on or after October 22, 2013, an employer's account shall not be relieved of charges related to a benefit payment that was made erroneously from the division if it is determined that: (1)  The erroneous benefit payment was made because the employer, or an agent of the employer, failed to respond in a timely or adequate manner to a request from the division for information related to the claim for benefits, including failing to provide the information required by subsection (a) of this section upon a separation from employment; and (2)  The employer, or an agent of the employer, has established a pattern of failing to respond in a timely or adequate manner to requests from the division for information related to claims for benefits, including failing to provide the information required by subsection (a) of this section upon a separation from employment. Determinations of the division prohibiting the relief of charges pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to appeal in the same manner as other determinations of the division related to the charging of employer accounts. For purposes of subsection (j) of this section: "Erroneous benefit payment" means a benefit payment that, except for the failure by the employer, or an agent of the employer, to respond in a timely or adequate manner to a request from the division for information with respect to the claim for benefits, would not have been made; and "Pattern of failing" means repeated documented failure on the part of the employer, or an agent of the employer, to respond to requests from the division to the employer or employer's agent for information related to a claim for benefits, including failing to provide the information required by subsection (a) of this section upon a separation from employment, except that an employer, or an agent of an employer, shall not be determined to have engaged in a "pattern of failing" if the number of failures to provide the required information or respond to requests from the division for information related to claims for benefits during the previous 365 calendar days is less than three, or if the number of failures is less than two percent of the number of requests from the division, whichever is greater. (k)  The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall establish and maintain a procedure by which personnel access rights to the department's primary system for unemployment claims receipt and processing are comprehensively reviewed every calendar quarter.  The procedure shall include an evaluation of access needs to the primary unemployment claims receipt and processing system for all department personnel and the adjustment, addition, or deletion of access rights for department personnel based on the quarterly review. (l)  The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall develop within the departments primary system for unemployment claims receipt and processing a mechanism for claimants to electronically access their own benefit payment status and history. (cf: P.L.2022, c.120, s.1) 5.    R.S.43:21-7 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-7.  Employers other than governmental entities, whose benefit financing provisions are set forth in section 4 of P.L.1971, c.346 (C.43:21-7.3), and those nonprofit organizations liable for payment in lieu of contributions on the basis set forth in section 3 of P.L.1971, c.346 (C.43:21-7.2), shall pay to the controller for the unemployment compensation fund, contributions as set forth in subsections (a), (b) and (c) hereof, and the provisions of subsections (d) and (e) shall be applicable to all employers, consistent with the provisions of the "unemployment compensation law" and the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.). (a)   Payment. (1)   Contributions shall accrue and become payable by each employer for each calendar year in which he is subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), with respect to having individuals in his employ during that calendar year, at the rates and on the basis hereinafter set forth. Such contributions shall become due and be paid by each employer to the controller for the fund, in accordance with such regulations as may be prescribed, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in his employ. (2)   In the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to $0.005 or more, in which case it shall be increased to $0.01. (b)   Rate of contributions. Each employer shall pay the following contributions: (1)   For the calendar year 1947, and each calendar year thereafter, 2 7/10% of wages paid by him during each such calendar year, except as otherwise prescribed by subsection (c) of this section. (2)   The "wages" of any individual, with respect to any one employer, as the term is used in this subsection (b) and in subsections (c), (d) and (e) of this section 7, shall include the first $4,800.00 paid during calendar year 1975, for services performed either within or without this State; provided that no contribution shall be required by this State with respect to services performed in another state if such other state imposes contribution liability with respect thereto. If an employer (hereinafter referred to as a successor employer) during any calendar year acquires substantially all the property used in a trade or business of another employer (hereinafter referred to as a predecessor), or used in a separate unit of a trade or business of a predecessor, and immediately after the acquisition employs in his trade or business an individual who immediately prior to the acquisition was employed in the trade or business of such predecessors, then, for the purpose of determining whether the successor employer has paid wages with respect to employment equal to the first $4,800.00 paid during calendar year 1975, any wages paid to such individual by such predecessor during such calendar year and prior to such acquisition shall be considered as having been paid by such successor employer. (3)   For calendar years beginning on and after January 1, 1976, the "wages" of any individual, as defined in the preceding paragraph (2) of this subsection (b), shall be established and promulgated by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development on or before September 1 of the preceding year and, except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection (b), shall be, 28 times the Statewide average weekly remuneration paid to workers by employers, as determined under R.S.43:21-3(c), raised to the next higher multiple of $100.00 if not already a multiple thereof, provided that if the amount of wages so determined for a calendar year is less than the amount similarly determined for the preceding year, the greater amount will be used; provided, further, that if the amount of such wages so determined does not equal or exceed the amount of wages as defined in subsection (b) of section 3306 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.3306(b)), the wages as determined in this paragraph in any calendar year shall be raised to equal the amount established under the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," chapter 23 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.3301 et seq.), for that calendar year. (4)   For calendar years beginning on and after January 1, 2020, the "wages" of any individual, as defined in the preceding paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) for purposes of contributions of workers to the State disability benefits fund, including the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, shall be established and promulgated by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development on or before September 1 of the preceding year and shall be 107 times the Statewide average weekly remuneration paid to workers by employers, as determined under R.S.43:21-3(c), raised to the next higher multiple of $100.00 if not already a multiple thereof, provided that if the amount of wages so determined for a calendar year is less than the amount similarly determined for the preceding year, the greater amount will be used. (c)   Future rates based on benefit experience. (1)   A separate account for each employer shall be maintained and this shall be credited with all the contributions which he has paid on his own behalf on or before January 31 of any calendar year with respect to employment occurring in the preceding calendar year; provided, however, that if January 31 of any calendar year falls on a Saturday or Sunday, an employer's account shall be credited as of January 31 of such calendar year with all the contributions which he has paid on or before the next succeeding day which is not a Saturday or Sunday. But nothing in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) shall be construed to grant any employer or individuals in his service prior claims or rights to the amounts paid by him into the fund either on his own behalf or on behalf of such individuals. Benefits paid with respect to benefit years commencing on and after January 1, 1953, to any individual on or before December 31 of any calendar year with respect to unemployment in such calendar year and in preceding calendar years shall be charged against the account or accounts of the employer or employers in whose employment such individual established base weeks constituting the basis of such benefits, except that, with respect to benefit years commencing after January 4, 1998, an employer's account shall not be charged for benefits paid to a claimant if: (1) the claimant's employment by that employer was ended in any way which, pursuant to subsection (a), (b), (c), (f), (g) or (h) of R.S.43:21-5, would have disqualified the claimant for benefits if the claimant had applied for benefits at the time when that employment ended, or (2) the claimants employment by that employer continued and the claimant continued to both perform work for and receive remuneration from that employer, during the claimants period of unemployment.  Benefits paid under a given benefit determination shall be charged against the account of the employer to whom such determination relates.  When each benefit payment is made, notification shall be promptly provided to each employer included in the unemployment insurance monetary calculation of benefits.  Such notification shall identify the employer against whose account the amount of such payment is being charged, shall show at least the name and social security account number of the claimant and shall specify the period of unemployment to which said benefit payment applies. An annual summary statement of unemployment benefits charged to the employer's account shall be provided. (2)   Regulations may be prescribed for the establishment, maintenance, and dissolution of joint accounts by two or more employers, and shall, in accordance with such regulations and upon application by two or more employers to establish such an account, or to merge their several individual accounts in a joint account, maintain such joint account as if it constituted a single employer's account. (3)   No employer's rate shall be lower than 5.4% unless assignment of such lower rate is consistent with the conditions applicable to additional credit allowance for such year under section 3303(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.3303(a)(1)), any other provision of this section to the contrary notwithstanding. (4)   Employer Reserve Ratio. (A)  Each employer's rate shall be 2 8/10%, except as otherwise provided in the following provisions.  No employer's rate for the 12 months commencing July 1 of any calendar year shall be other than 2 8/10%, unless as of the preceding January 31 such employer shall have paid contributions with respect to wages paid in each of the three calendar years immediately preceding such year, in which case such employer's rate for the 12 months commencing July 1 of any calendar year shall be determined on the basis of his record up to the beginning of such calendar year. If, at the beginning of such calendar year, the total of all his contributions, paid on his own behalf, for all past years exceeds the total benefits charged to his account for all such years, his contribution rate shall be: (1)   2 5/10%, if such excess equals or exceeds 4%, but less than 5%, of his average annual payroll (as defined in paragraph (2), subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-19); (2)   2 2/10%, if such excess equals or exceeds 5%, but is less than 6%, of his average annual payroll; (3)   1 9/10%, if such excess equals or exceeds 6%, but is less than 7%, of his average annual payroll; (4)   1 6/10%, if such excess equals or exceeds 7%, but is less than 8%, of his average annual payroll; (5)   1 3/10%, if such excess equals or exceeds 8%, but is less than 9%, of his average annual payroll; (6)   1%, if such excess equals or exceeds 9%, but is less than 10%, of his average annual payroll; (7)   7/10 of 1%, if such excess equals or exceeds 10%, but is less than 11%, of his average annual payroll; (8)   4/10 of 1%, if such excess equals or exceeds 11% of his average annual payroll. (B)  If the total of an employer's contributions, paid on his own behalf, for all past periods for the purposes of this paragraph (4), is less than the total benefits charged against his account during the same period, his rate shall be: (1)   4%, if such excess is less than 10% of his average annual payroll; (2)   4 3/10%, if such excess equals or exceeds 10%, but is less than 20%, of his average annual payroll; (3)   4 6/10%, if such excess equals or exceeds 20% of his average annual payroll. (C)  Specially assigned rates. (i)    If no contributions were paid on wages for employment in any calendar year used in determining the average annual payroll of an employer eligible for an assigned rate under this paragraph (4), the employer's rate shall be specially assigned as follows: if the reserve balance in its account is positive, its assigned rate shall be the highest rate in effect for positive balance accounts for that period, or 5.4%, whichever is higher, and if the reserve balance in its account is negative, its assigned rate shall be the highest rate in effect for deficit accounts for that period. (ii)   If, following the purchase of a corporation with little or no activity, known as a corporate shell, the resulting employing unit operates a new or different business activity, the employing unit shall be assigned a new employer rate. (iii) Entities operating under common ownership, management or control, when the operation of the entities is not identifiable, distinguishable and severable, shall be considered a single employer for the purposes of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (D)  The contribution rates prescribed by subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph (4) shall be increased or decreased in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (5) of this subsection (c) for experience rating periods through June 30, 1986. (5)   (A)  Unemployment Trust Fund Reserve Ratio. If on March 31 of any calendar year the balance in the unemployment trust fund equals or exceeds 4% but is less than 7% of the total taxable wages reported to the controller as of that date in respect to employment during the preceding calendar year, the contribution rate, effective July 1 following, of each employer eligible for a contribution rate calculation based upon benefit experience, shall be increased by 3/10 of 1% over the contribution rate otherwise established under the provisions of paragraph (3) or (4) of this subsection.  If on March 31 of any calendar year the balance of the unemployment trust fund exceeds 2 1/2% but is less than 4% of the total taxable wages reported to the controller as of that date in respect to employment during the preceding calendar year, the contribution rate, effective July 1 following, of each employer eligible for a contribution rate calculation based upon benefit experience, shall be increased by 6/10 of 1% over the contribution rate otherwise established under the provisions of paragraph (3) or (4) of this subsection. If on March 31 of any calendar year the balance of the unemployment trust fund is less than 2 1/2% of the total taxable wages reported to the controller as of that date in respect to employment during the preceding calendar year, the contribution rate, effective July 1 following, of each employer: (1) eligible for a contribution rate calculation based upon benefit experience, shall be increased by (i) 6/10 of 1% over the contribution rate otherwise established under the provisions of paragraph (3), (4)(A) or (4)(B) of this subsection, and (ii) an additional amount equal to 20% of the total rate established herein, provided, however, that the final contribution rate for each employer shall be computed to the nearest multiple of 1/10% if not already a multiple thereof; (2) not eligible for a contribution rate calculation based upon benefit experience, shall be increased by 6/10 of 1% over the contribution rate otherwise established under the provisions of paragraph (4) of this subsection. For the period commencing July 1, 1984 and ending June 30, 1986, the contribution rate for each employer liable to pay contributions under R.S.43:21-7 shall be increased by a factor of 10% computed to the nearest multiple of 1/10% if not already a multiple thereof. (B)  If on March 31 of any calendar year the balance in the unemployment trust fund equals or exceeds 10% but is less than 12 1/2% of the total taxable wages reported to the controller as of that date in respect to employment during the preceding calendar year, the contribution rate, effective July 1 following, of each employer eligible for a contribution rate calculation based upon benefit experience, shall be reduced by 3/10 of 1% under the contribution rate otherwise established under the provisions of paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection; provided that in no event shall the contribution rate of any employer be reduced to less than 4/10 of 1%. If on March 31 of any calendar year the balance in the unemployment trust fund equals or exceeds 12 1/2% of the total taxable wages reported to the controller as of that date in respect to employment during the preceding calendar year, the contribution rate, effective July 1 following, of each employer eligible for a contribution rate calculation based upon benefit experience, shall be reduced by 6/10 of 1% if his account for all past periods reflects an excess of contributions paid over total benefits charged of 3% or more of his average annual payroll, otherwise by 3/10 of 1% under the contribution rate otherwise established under the provisions of paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection; provided that in no event shall the contribution rate of any employer be reduced to less than 4/10 of 1%. (C)  The "balance" in the unemployment trust fund, as the term is used in subparagraphs (A) and (B) above, shall not include moneys credited to the State's account under section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. s.1103), during any period in which such moneys are appropriated for the payment of expenses incurred in the administration of the "unemployment compensation law." (D)  Prior to July 1 of each calendar year the controller shall determine the Unemployment Trust Fund Reserve Ratio, which shall be calculated by dividing the balance of the unemployment trust fund as of the prior March 31 by total taxable wages reported to the controller by all employers as of March 31 with respect to their employment during the last calendar year. (E)  (i) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1997, c.263). (ii)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2001, c.152). (iii)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2003, c.107). (iv)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2004, c.45). (v)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.17). (vi)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2013, c.75). (vii)  With respect to experience rating years beginning on or after July 1, 2011, the new employer rate or the unemployment experience rate of an employer under this section shall be the rate which appears in the column headed by the Unemployment Trust Fund Reserve Ratio as of the applicable calculation date and on the line with the Employer Reserve Ratio, as defined in paragraph (4) of this subsection (R.S.43:21-7 (c)(4)), as set forth in the following table: EXPERIENCE RATING TAX TABLE Fund Reserve Ratio1 3.50%  3.00%  2.5%    2.0%    1.99% Employer and       to         to         to        and Reserve                               Over    3.49%  2.99%  2.49%  Under Ratio2 A         B         C         D         E Positive Reserve Ratio: 17% and over                     0.3       0.4       0.5       0.6       1.2 16.00% to 16.99%                  0.4       0.5       0.6       0.6       1.2 15.00% to 15.99%                  0.4       0.6       0.7       0.7       1.2 14.00% to 14.99%                  0.5       0.6 0.7       0.8       1.2 13.00% to 13.99%                  0.6       0.7       0.8       0.9       1.2 12.00% to 12.99%                  0.6       0.8       0.9       1.0       1.2 11.00% to 11.99%                  0.7       0.8       1.0       1.1       1.2 10.00% to 10.99%                  0.9       1.1       1.3       1.5       1.6 9.00% to 9.99%                      1.0       1.3       1.6       1.7       1.9 8.00% to 8.99%                      1.3       1.6       1.9       2.1       2.3 7.00% to 7.99%                      1.4       1.8       2.2       2.4       2.6 6.00% to 6.99%                      1.7       2.1       2.5       2.8       3.0 5.00% to 5.99%                      1.9       2.4       2.8       3.1       3.4 4.00% to 4.99%                      2.0       2.6       3.1       3.4       3.7 3.00% to 3.99%                      2.1       2.7       3.2       3.6       3.9 2.00% to 2.99%                      2.2       2.8       3.3       3.7       4.0 1.00% to 1.99%                      2.3       2.9       3.4       3.8       4.1 0.00% to 0.99%                      2.4       3.0       3.6       4.0       4.3 Deficit Reserve Ratio: -0.00% to -2.99%                   3.4       4.3       5.1       5.6       6.1 -3.00% to -5.99%                   3.4       4.3       5.1       5.7       6.2 -6.00% to -8.99%                   3.5       4.4       5.2       5.8       6.3 -9.00% to-11.99%                  3.5       4.5       5.3       5.9       6.4 -12.00% to-14.99%                3.6       4.6       5.4       6.0       6.5 -15.00% to-19.99%                3.6       4.6       5.5       6.1       6.6 -20.00% to-24.99%                3.7       4.7       5.6       6.2       6.7 -25.00% to-29.99%                3.7       4.8       5.6       6.3       6.8 -30.00% to-34.99%                3.8       4.8       5.7       6.3       6.9 -35.00% and under                 5.4       5.4       5.8       6.4       7.0 New Employer Rate              2.8       2.8       2.8       3.1       3.4 1Fund balance as of March 31 as a percentage of taxable wages in the prior calendar year. 2Employer Reserve Ratio (Contributions minus benefits as a percentage of employer's taxable wages). (F)  (i)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1997, c.263). (ii)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.17). (iii)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2013, c.75). (iv)  With respect to experience rating years beginning on or after July 1, 2011 and before July 1, 2013, if the fund reserve ratio, based on the fund balance as of the prior March 31, is less than 1.0%, the contribution rate for each employer liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be increased by a factor of 10% computed to the nearest multiple of 1/10% if not already a multiple thereof. (v)   With respect to experience rating years beginning on or after July 1, 2014, if the fund reserve ratio, based on the fund balance as of the prior March 31, is less than 1.0%, the contribution rate for each employer liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be increased by a factor of 10% computed to the nearest multiple of 1/10% if not already a multiple thereof. (G)  On or after January 1, 1993, notwithstanding any other provisions of this paragraph (5), the contribution rate for each employer liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be decreased by 0.1%, except that, during any experience rating year starting before January 1, 1998 in which the fund reserve ratio is equal to or greater than 7.00% or during any experience rating year starting on or after January 1, 1998, in which the fund reserve ratio is equal to or greater than 3.5%, there shall be no decrease pursuant to this subparagraph (G) in the contribution of any employer who has a deficit reserve ratio of negative 35.00% or under. (H)  On and after January 1, 1998 until December 31, 2000 and on or after January 1, 2002 until June 30, 2006, the contribution rate for each employer liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be decreased by a factor, as set out below, computed to the nearest multiple of 1/10%, except that, if an employer has a deficit reserve ratio of negative 35.0% or under, the employer's rate of contribution shall not be reduced pursuant to this subparagraph (H) to less than 5.4%: From January 1, 1998 until December 31, 1998, a factor of 12%; From January 1, 1999 until December 31, 1999, a factor of 10%; From January 1, 2000 until December 31, 2000, a factor of 7%; From January 1, 2002 until March 31, 2002, a factor of 36%; From April 1, 2002 until June 30, 2002, a factor of 85%; From July 1, 2002 until June 30, 2003, a factor of 15%; From July 1, 2003 until June 30, 2004, a factor of 15%; From July 1, 2004 until June 30, 2005, a factor of 7%; From July 1, 2005 until December 31, 2005, a factor of 16%; and From January 1, 2006 until June 30, 2006, a factor of 34%. The amount of the reduction in the employer contributions stipulated by this subparagraph (H) shall be in addition to the amount of the reduction in the employer contributions stipulated by subparagraph (G) of this paragraph (5), except that the rate of contribution of an employer who has a deficit reserve ratio of negative 35.0% or under shall not be reduced pursuant to this subparagraph (H) to less than 5.4% and the rate of contribution of any other employer shall not be reduced to less than 0.0%. (I)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.17). (J)   On or after July 1, 2001, notwithstanding any other provisions of this paragraph (5), the contribution rate for each employer liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be decreased by 0.0175%, except that, during any experience rating year starting on or after July 1, 2001, in which the fund reserve ratio is equal to or greater than 3.5%, there shall be no decrease pursuant to this subparagraph (J) in the contribution of any employer who has a deficit reserve ratio of negative 35.00% or under. The amount of the reduction in the employer contributions stipulated by this subparagraph (J) shall be in addition to the amount of the reduction in the employer contributions stipulated by subparagraphs (G) and (H) of this paragraph (5), except that the rate of contribution of an employer who has a deficit reserve ratio of negative 35.0% or under shall not be reduced pursuant to this subparagraph (J) to less than 5.4% and the rate of contribution of any other employer shall not be reduced to less than 0.0%. (K)  With respect to experience rating years beginning on or after July 1, 2009, if the fund reserve ratio, based on the fund balance as of the prior March 31, is: (i)    Equal to or greater than 5.00% but less than 7.5%, the contribution rate for each employer liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be reduced by a factor of 25% computed to the nearest multiple of 1/10% if not already a multiple thereof except that there shall be no decrease pursuant to this subparagraph (K) in the contribution of any employer who has a deficit reserve ratio of 35.00% or under; (ii)   Equal to or greater than 7.5%, the contribution rate for each employer liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be reduced by a factor of 50% computed to the nearest multiple of 1/10% if not already a multiple thereof except that there shall be no decrease pursuant to this subparagraph (K) in the contribution of any employer who has a deficit reserve ratio of 35.00% or under. (L)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (5) and notwithstanding the actual fund reserve ratio, the contribution rate for employers liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be, for fiscal year 2011, the rates set by column "C" of the table in that subparagraph. (M)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (5) and notwithstanding the actual fund reserve ratio, the contribution rate for employers liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be, for fiscal year 2012, the rates set by column "D" of the table in that subparagraph. (N)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (5) and notwithstanding the actual fund reserve ratio, the contribution rate for employers liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be, for fiscal year 2013, the rates set by column "E" of the table in that subparagraph. (O)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (5) and notwithstanding the actual fund reserve ratio, the contribution rate for employers liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be, for fiscal year 2022, the rates set by column "C" of the table in that subparagraph. (P)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (5) and notwithstanding the actual fund reserve ratio, the contribution rate for employers liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be, for fiscal year 2023, the rates set by column "D" of the table in that subparagraph, unless the application of the provisions of this paragraph (5) using the actual fund reserve ratio would result in the contribution rate for employers being set by a column which has lower tax rates than the rates in column "D", in which case the employers shall be liable to pay contributions at the rates set by the column with the lower tax rates. (Q)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (5) and notwithstanding the actual fund reserve ratio, the contribution rate for employers liable to pay contributions, as computed under subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (5), shall be, for fiscal year 2024, the rates set by column "E" of the table in that subparagraph, unless the application of the provisions of this paragraph (5) using the actual fund reserve ratio would result in the contribution rate for employers being set by a column which has lower tax rates than the rates in column "E", in which case the employers shall be liable to pay contributions at the rates set by the column with the lower tax rates. (6)   Additional contributions. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any employer who has been assigned a contribution rate pursuant to subsection (c) of this section for the year commencing July 1, 1948, and for any year commencing July 1 thereafter, may voluntarily make payment of additional contributions, and upon such payment shall receive a recomputation of the experience rate applicable to such employer, including in the calculation the additional contribution so made, except that, following a transfer as described under R.S.43:21-7(c)(7)(D), neither the predecessor nor successor in interest shall be eligible to make a voluntary payment of additional contributions during the year the transfer occurs and the next full calendar year. Any such additional contribution shall be made during the 30-day period following the notification to the employer of his contribution rate as prescribed in this section, unless, for good cause, the time for payment has been extended by the controller for not to exceed an additional 60 days; provided that in no event may such payments which are made later than 120 days after the beginning of the year for which such rates are effective be considered in determining the experience rate for the year in which the payment is made. Any employer receiving any extended period of time within which to make such additional payment and failing to make such payment timely shall be, in addition to the required amount of additional payment, liable for a penalty of 5% thereof or $5.00, whichever is greater, not to exceed $50.00. Any adjustment under this subsection shall be made only in the form of credits against accrued or future contributions. (7)   Transfers. (A)  Upon the transfer of the organization, trade or business, or substantially all the assets of an employer to a successor in interest, whether by merger, consolidation, sale, transfer, descent or otherwise, the controller shall transfer the employment experience of the predecessor employer to the successor in interest, including credit for past years, contributions paid, annual payrolls, benefit charges, et cetera, applicable to such predecessor employer, pursuant to regulation, if it is determined that the employment experience of the predecessor employer with respect to the organization, trade, assets or business which has been transferred may be considered indicative of the future employment experience of the successor in interest.  The successor in interest may, within four months of the date of such transfer of the organization, trade, assets or business, or thereafter upon good cause shown, request a reconsideration of the transfer of employment experience of the predecessor employer.  The request for reconsideration shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the controller, that the employment experience of the predecessor is not indicative of the future employment experience of the successor. (B)  An employer who transfers part of his or its organization, trade, assets or business to a successor in interest, whether by merger, consolidation, sale, transfer, descent or otherwise, may jointly make application with such successor in interest for transfer of that portion of the employment experience of the predecessor employer relating to the portion of the organization, trade, assets or business transferred to the successor in interest, including credit for past years, contributions paid, annual payrolls, benefit charges, et cetera, applicable to such predecessor employer. The transfer of employment experience may be allowed pursuant to regulation only if it is found that the employment experience of the predecessor employer with respect to the portion of the organization, trade, assets or business which has been transferred may be considered indicative of the future employment experience of the successor in interest. Credit shall be given to the successor in interest only for the years during which contributions were paid by the predecessor employer with respect to that part of the organization, trade, assets or business transferred. (C)  A transfer of the employment experience in whole or in part having become final, the predecessor employer thereafter shall not be entitled to consideration for an adjusted rate based upon his or its experience or the part thereof, as the case may be, which has thus been transferred.  A successor in interest to whom employment experience or a part thereof is transferred pursuant to this subsection shall, as of the date of the transfer of the organization, trade, assets or business, or part thereof, immediately become an employer if not theretofore an employer subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (D)  If an employer transfers in whole or in part his or its organization, trade, assets or business to a successor in interest, whether by merger, consolidation, sale, transfer, descent or otherwise and both the employer and successor in interest are at the time of the transfer under common ownership, management or control, then the employment experience attributable to the transferred business shall also be transferred to and combined with the employment experience of the successor in interest.  The transfer of the employment experience is mandatory and not subject to appeal or protest. (E)  The transfer of part of an employer's employment experience to a successor in interest shall become effective as of the first day of the calendar quarter following the acquisition by the successor in interest.  As of the effective date, the successor in interest shall have its employer rate recalculated by merging its existing employment experience, if any, with the employment experience acquired.  If the successor in interest is not an employer as of the date of acquisition, it shall be assigned the new employer rate until the effective date of the transfer of employment experience. (F)   Upon the transfer in whole or in part of the organization, trade, assets or business to a successor in interest, the employment experience shall not be transferred if the successor in interest is not an employer at the time of the acquisition and the controller finds that the successor in interest acquired the business solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions. (d)   Contributions of workers to the unemployment compensation fund and the State disability benefits fund. (1)  (A)  For periods after January 1, 1975, each worker shall contribute to the fund 1% of his wages with respect to his employment with an employer, which occurs on and after January 1, 1975, after such employer has satisfied the condition set forth in subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19 with respect to becoming an employer; provided, however, that such contributions shall be at the rate of 1/2 of 1% of wages paid with respect to employment while the worker is in the employ of the State of New Jersey, or any governmental entity or instrumentality which is an employer as defined under R.S.43:21-19(h)(5), or is covered by an approved private plan under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" or while the worker is exempt from the provisions of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" under section 7 of that law, P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-31). (B)  Effective January 1, 1978 there shall be no contributions by workers in the employ of any governmental or nongovernmental employer electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions unless the employer is covered by the State plan under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" (C.43:21-25 et al.), and in that case contributions shall be at the rate of 1/2 of 1%, except that commencing July 1, 1986, workers in the employ of any nongovernmental employer electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions shall be required to make contributions to the fund at the same rate prescribed for workers of other nongovernmental employers. (C)  (i) Notwithstanding the above provisions of this paragraph (1), during the period starting July 1, 1986 and ending December 31, 1992, each worker shall contribute to the fund 1.125% of wages paid with respect to his employment with a governmental employer electing or required to pay contributions or nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under R.S.43:21-19(h)(6), regardless of whether that nonprofit organization elects or is required to finance its benefit costs with contributions to the fund or by payments in lieu of contributions, after that employer has satisfied the conditions set forth in subsection R.S.43:21-19(h) with respect to becoming an employer.  Contributions, however, shall be at the rate of 0.625% while the worker is covered by an approved private plan under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" or while the worker is exempt under section 7 of that law, P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-31) or any other provision of that law; provided that such contributions shall be at the rate of 0.625% of wages paid with respect to employment with the State of New Jersey or any other governmental entity or instrumentality electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions and which is covered by the State plan under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," except that, while the worker is exempt from the provisions of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" under section 7 of that law, P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-31) or any other provision of that law, or is covered for disability benefits by an approved private plan of the employer, the contributions to the fund shall be 0.125%. (ii)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1995, c.422.) (D)  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this paragraph (1), during the period starting January 1, 1993 and ending June 30, 1994, each worker shall contribute to the unemployment compensation fund 0.5% of wages paid with respect to the worker's employment with a governmental employer electing or required to pay contributions or nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19, regardless of whether that nonprofit organization elects or is required to finance its benefit costs with contributions to the fund or by payments in lieu of contributions, after that employer has satisfied the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19 with respect to becoming an employer.  No contributions, however, shall be made by the worker while the worker is covered by an approved private plan under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.) or while the worker is exempt under section 7 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-31) or any other provision of that law; provided that the contributions shall be at the rate of 0.50% of wages paid with respect to employment with the State of New Jersey or any other governmental entity or instrumentality electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions and which is covered by the State plan under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," except that, while the worker is exempt from the provisions of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" under section 7 of that law, P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-31) or any other provision of that law, or is covered for disability benefits by an approved private plan of the employer, no contributions shall be made to the fund. Each worker shall, starting on January 1, 1996 and ending March 31, 1996, contribute to the unemployment compensation fund 0.60% of wages paid with respect to the worker's employment with a governmental employer electing or required to pay contributions or nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19, regardless of whether that nonprofit organization elects or is required to finance its benefit costs with contributions to the fund or by payments in lieu of contributions, after that employer has satisfied the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19 with respect to becoming an employer, provided that the contributions shall be at the rate of 0.10% of wages paid with respect to employment with the State of New Jersey or any other governmental entity or instrumentality electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions. Each worker shall, starting on January 1, 1998 and ending December 31, 1998, contribute to the unemployment compensation fund 0.10% of wages paid with respect to the worker's employment with a governmental employer electing or required to pay contributions or nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19, regardless of whether that nonprofit organization elects or is required to finance its benefit costs with contributions to the fund or by payments in lieu of contributions, after that employer has satisfied the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19 with respect to becoming an employer, provided that the contributions shall be at the rate of 0.10% of wages paid with respect to employment with the State of New Jersey or any other governmental entity or instrumentality electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions. Each worker shall, starting on January 1, 1999 until December 31, 1999, contribute to the unemployment compensation fund 0.15% of wages paid with respect to the worker's employment with a governmental employer electing or required to pay contributions or nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19, regardless of whether that nonprofit organization elects or is required to finance its benefit costs with contributions to the fund or by payments in lieu of contributions, after that employer has satisfied the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19 with respect to becoming an employer, provided that the contributions shall be at the rate of 0.10% of wages paid with respect to employment with the State of New Jersey or any other governmental entity or instrumentality electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions. Each worker shall, starting on January 1, 2000 until December 31, 2001, contribute to the unemployment compensation fund 0.20% of wages paid with respect to the worker's employment with a governmental employer electing or required to pay contributions or nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19, regardless of whether that nonprofit organization elects or is required to finance its benefit costs with contributions to the fund or by payments in lieu of contributions, after that employer has satisfied the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19 with respect to becoming an employer, provided that the contributions shall be at the rate of 0.10% of wages paid with respect to employment with the State of New Jersey or any other governmental entity or instrumentality electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions. Each worker shall, starting on January 1, 2002 until June 30, 2004, contribute to the unemployment compensation fund 0.1825% of wages paid with respect to the worker's employment with a governmental employer electing or required to pay contributions or a nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19, regardless of whether that nonprofit organization elects or is required to finance its benefit costs with contributions to the fund or by payments in lieu of contributions, after that employer has satisfied the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19 with respect to becoming an employer, provided that the contributions shall be at the rate of 0.0825% of wages paid with respect to employment with the State of New Jersey or any other governmental entity or instrumentality electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions. Each worker shall, starting on and after July 1, 2004, contribute to the unemployment compensation fund 0.3825% of wages paid with respect to the worker's employment with a governmental employer electing or required to pay contributions or nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19, regardless of whether that nonprofit organization elects or is required to finance its benefit costs with contributions to the fund or by payments in lieu of contributions, after that employer has satisfied the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19 with respect to becoming an employer, provided that the contributions shall be at the rate of 0.0825% of wages paid with respect to employment with the State of New Jersey or any other governmental entity or instrumentality electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions. (E)  Each employer shall, notwithstanding any provision of law in this State to the contrary, withhold in trust the amount of his workers' contributions from their wages at the time such wages are paid, shall show such deduction on his payroll records, shall furnish such evidence thereof to his workers as the division or controller may prescribe, and shall transmit all such contributions, in addition to his own contributions, to the office of the controller in such manner and at such times as may be prescribed.  If any employer fails to deduct the contributions of any of his workers at the time their wages are paid, or fails to make a deduction therefor at the time wages are paid for the next succeeding payroll period, he alone shall thereafter be liable for such contributions, and for the purpose of R.S.43:21-14, such contributions shall be treated as employer's contributions required from him. (F)   As used in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), except when the context clearly requires otherwise, the term "contributions" shall include the contributions of workers pursuant to this section. (G)  (i)  Each worker, with respect to the worker's employment with a government employer electing or required to pay contributions to the State disability benefits fund or nongovernmental employer, including a nonprofit organization which is an employer as defined under paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of R.S.43:21-19, unless the employer is covered by an approved private disability plan or is exempt from the provisions of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.) under section 7 of that law (C.43:21-31) or any other provision of that law, shall, for calendar year 2012 and each subsequent calendar year, make contributions to the State disability benefits fund at the annual rate of contribution necessary to obtain a total amount of contributions, which, when added to employer contributions made to the State disability benefits fund pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, is, for calendar years prior to calendar year 2018, equal to 120% of the benefits paid for periods of disability, excluding periods of family temporary disability, during the immediately preceding calendar year plus an amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the payment of those benefits during the immediately preceding calendar year, less the amount of net assets remaining in the State disability benefits fund, excluding net assets remaining in the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" of that fund, as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year, and is, for calendar year 2018 and year 2019, equal to 120% of the benefits paid for periods of disability, excluding periods of family temporary disability, during the last preceding full fiscal year plus an amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the payment of those benefits during the last preceding full fiscal year, less the amount of net assets anticipated to be remaining in the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" of that fund, as of December 31 of the immediately preceding calendar year, and is, for each of calendar years 2020 and 2021, equal to 120% of the benefits which the department anticipates will be paid for periods of disability, excluding periods of family temporary disability, during the respective calendar year plus an amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the payment of those benefits which the department anticipates during the respective calendar year, less the amount of net assets anticipated to be remaining in the State disability benefits fund, excluding net assets remaining in the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" of that fund, as of December 31 of the immediately preceding calendar year, and is, for calendar year 2022 and any subsequent calendar year, equal to 120% of the benefits paid for periods of disability, excluding periods of family temporary disability, during the last preceding full fiscal year plus an amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the payment of those benefits during the last preceding full fiscal year, less the amount of net assets anticipated to be remaining in the State disability benefits fund, excluding net assets remaining in the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" of that fund, as of December 31 of the immediately preceding calendar year.  All increases in the cost of benefits for periods of disability caused by the increases in the weekly benefit rate commencing July 1, 2020, pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-40), shall be funded by contributions made by workers pursuant to this paragraph (i) and none of those increases shall be funded by employer contributions.  The estimated rates for the next calendar year shall be made available on the department's website no later than 60 days after the end of the last preceding full fiscal year.  The rates of employer contributions determined pursuant to subsection (e) of this section for any year shall be determined prior to the determination of the rate of employee contributions pursuant to this subparagraph (i) and any consideration of employee contributions in determining employer rates for any year shall be based on amounts of employee contributions made prior to the year to which the rate of employee contributions applies and shall not be based on any projection or estimate of the amount of employee contributions for the year to which that rate applies. (ii)   Each worker shall contribute to the State disability benefits fund, in addition to any amount contributed pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (1)(G), an amount equal to, during calendar year 2009, 0.09%, and during calendar year 2010 0.12%, of wages paid with respect to the worker's employment with any covered employer, including a governmental employer which is an employer as defined under R.S.43:21-19(h)(5), unless the employer is covered by an approved private disability plan for benefits during periods of family temporary disability leave.  The contributions made pursuant to this subparagraph (ii) to the State disability benefits fund shall be deposited into an account of that fund reserved for the payment of benefits during periods of family temporary disability leave as defined in section 3 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27) and for the administration of those payments and shall not be used for any other purpose.  This account shall be known as the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account."  For calendar year 2011 and each subsequent calendar year until 2018, the annual rate of contribution to be paid by workers pursuant to this subparagraph (ii) shall be, for calendar years prior to calendar year 2018, the rate necessary to obtain a total amount of contributions equal to 125% of the benefits paid for periods of family temporary disability leave during the immediately preceding calendar year plus an amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the payment of those benefits during the immediately preceding calendar year, less the amount of net assets remaining in the account as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year, and shall be, for calendar year 2018 and calendar year 2019, the rate necessary to obtain a total amount of contributions equal to 125% of the benefits paid for periods of family temporary disability leave during the last preceding full fiscal year plus an amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the payment of those benefits during the last preceding full fiscal year, less the amount of net assets anticipated to be remaining in the account as of December 31 of the immediately preceding calendar year.  For each of calendar years 2020 and 2021, the annual rate of contribution to be paid by workers pursuant to this subparagraph (ii) shall be the rate necessary to obtain a total amount of contributions equal to 125% of the benefits which the department anticipates will be paid for periods of family temporary disability leave during the respective calendar year plus an amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the payment of those benefits which the department anticipates during the respective calendar year, less the amount of net assets remaining in the account as of December 31 of the immediately preceding calendar year.  For 2022 and any subsequent calendar year, the annual rate of contribution to be paid by workers pursuant to this subparagraph (ii) shall be the rate necessary to obtain a total amount of contributions equal to 125% of the benefits which were paid for periods of family temporary disability leave during the last preceding full fiscal year plus an amount equal to 100% of the cost of administration of the payment of those benefits during the last preceding full fiscal year, less the amount of net assets remaining in the account as of December 31 of the immediately preceding calendar year.  All increases in the cost of benefits for periods of family temporary disability leave caused by the increases in the weekly benefit rate commencing July 1, 2020 pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-40) and increases in the maximum duration of benefits commencing July 1, 2020 pursuant to sections 14 and 15 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-38 and 43:21-39) shall be funded by contributions made by workers pursuant to this paragraph (ii) and none of those increases shall be funded by employer contributions.  The estimated rates for the next calendar year shall be made available on the department's website no later than 60 days after the end of the last preceding full fiscal year.  Necessary administrative costs shall include the cost of an outreach program to inform employees of the availability of the benefits and the cost of issuing the reports required or permitted pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2008, c.17 (C.43:21-39.4).  No monies, other than the funds in the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account," shall be used for the payment of benefits during periods of family temporary disability leave or for the administration of those payments, with the sole exception that, during calendar years 2008 and 2009, a total amount not exceeding $25 million may be transferred to that account from the revenues received in the State disability benefits fund pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (1)(G) and be expended for those payments and their administration, including the administration of the collection of contributions made pursuant to this subparagraph (ii) and any other necessary administrative costs.  Any amount transferred to the account pursuant to this subparagraph (ii) shall be repaid during a period beginning not later than January 1, 2011 and ending not later than December 31, 2015.  No monies, other than the funds in the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account," shall be used under any circumstances after December 31, 2009, for the payment of benefits during periods of family temporary disability leave or for the administration of those payments, including for the administration of the collection of contributions made pursuant to this subparagraph (ii). (2)  (A) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1984, c.24.) (B)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1984, c.24.) (C)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1994, c.112.) (D)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1994, c.112.) (E)  (i) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1994, c.112.) (ii)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1996, c.28.) (iii)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1994, c.112.) (3)  (A)  If an employee receives wages from more than one employer during any calendar year, and either the sum of his contributions deposited in and credited to the State disability benefits fund plus the amount of his contributions, if any, required towards the costs of benefits under one or more approved private plans under the provisions of section 9 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" (C.43:21-33) and deducted from his wages, or the sum of such latter contributions, if the employee is covered during such calendar year only by two or more private plans, exceeds an amount equal to 1/2 of 1% of the "wages" determined in accordance with the provisions of R.S.43:21-7(b)(3) during the calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 1976 or, during calendar year 2012 or any subsequent calendar year, the total amount of his contributions for the year exceeds the amount set by the annual rate of contribution determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to subparagraph (i) of paragraph (1)(G) of this subsection (d), the employee shall be entitled to a refund of the excess if he makes a claim to the controller within two years after the end of the calendar year in which the wages are received with respect to which the refund is claimed and establishes his right to such refund. Such refund shall be made by the controller from the State disability benefits fund. No interest shall be allowed or paid with respect to any such refund. The controller shall, in accordance with prescribed regulations, determine the portion of the aggregate amount of such refunds made during any calendar year which is applicable to private plans for which deductions were made under section 9 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" (C.43:21-33) such determination to be based upon the ratio of the amount of such wages exempt from contributions to such fund, as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection with respect to coverage under private plans, to the total wages so exempt plus the amount of such wages subject to contributions to the disability benefits fund, as provided in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of this subsection. The controller shall, in accordance with prescribed regulations, prorate the amount so determined among the applicable private plans in the proportion that the wages covered by each plan bear to the total private plan wages involved in such refunds, and shall assess against and recover from the employer, or the insurer if the insurer has indemnified the employer with respect thereto, the amount so prorated. The provisions of R.S.43:21-14 with respect to collection of employer contributions shall apply to such assessments. The amount so recovered by the controller shall be paid into the State disability benefits fund. (B)  If an employee receives wages from more than one employer during any calendar year, and the sum of his contributions deposited in the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" of the State disability benefits fund plus the amount of his contributions, if any, required towards the costs of family temporary disability leave benefits under one or more approved private plans under the provisions of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" (C.43:21-25 et al.) and deducted from his wages, exceeds an amount equal to, during calendar year 2009, 0.09% of the "wages" determined in accordance with the provisions of R.S.43:21-7(b)(3), or during calendar year 2010, 0.12% of those wages, or, during calendar year 2011 or any subsequent calendar year, the percentage of those wages set by the annual rate of contribution determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (1)(G) of this subsection (d), the employee shall be entitled to a refund of the excess if he makes a claim to the controller within two years after the end of the calendar year in which the wages are received with respect to which the refund is claimed and establishes his right to the refund. The refund shall be made by the controller from the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" of the State disability benefits fund. No interest shall be allowed or paid with respect to any such refund. The controller shall, in accordance with prescribed regulations, determine the portion of the aggregate amount of the refunds made during any calendar year which is applicable to private plans for which deductions were made under section 9 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" (C.43:21-33), with that determination based upon the ratio of the amount of such wages exempt from contributions to the fund, as provided in paragraph (1)(B) of this subsection (d) with respect to coverage under private plans, to the total wages so exempt plus the amount of such wages subject to contributions to the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" of the State disability benefits fund, as provided in subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (1)(G) of this subsection (d). The controller shall, in accordance with prescribed regulations, prorate the amount so determined among the applicable private plans in the proportion that the wages covered by each plan bear to the total private plan wages involved in such refunds, and shall assess against and recover from the employer, or the insurer if the insurer has indemnified the employer with respect thereto, the prorated amount. The provisions of R.S.43:21-14 with respect to collection of employer contributions shall apply to such assessments. The amount so recovered by the controller shall be paid into the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" of the State disability benefits fund. (4)   If an individual does not receive any wages from the employing unit which for the purposes of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) is treated as his employer, or receives his wages from some other employing unit, such employer shall nevertheless be liable for such individual's contributions in the first instance; and after payment thereof such employer may deduct the amount of such contributions from any sums payable by him to such employing unit, or may recover the amount of such contributions from such employing unit, or, in the absence of such an employing unit, from such individual, in a civil action; provided proceedings therefor are instituted within three months after the date on which such contributions are payable. General rules shall be prescribed whereby such an employing unit may recover the amount of such contributions from such individuals in the same manner as if it were the employer. (5)   Every employer who has elected to become an employer subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), or to cease to be an employer subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), pursuant to the provisions of R.S.43:21-8, shall post and maintain printed notices of such election on his premises, of such design, in such numbers, and at such places as the director may determine to be necessary to give notice thereof to persons in his service. (6)   Contributions by workers, payable to the controller as herein provided, shall be exempt from garnishment, attachment, execution, or any other remedy for the collection of debts. (e)   Contributions by employers to the State disability benefits fund. (1)   Except as hereinafter provided, each employer shall, in addition to the contributions required by subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, contribute 1/2 of 1% of the wages paid by such employer to workers with respect to employment unless he is not a covered employer as defined in subsection (a) of section 3 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" (C.43:21-27 (a)), except that the rate for the State of New Jersey shall be 1/10 of 1% for the calendar year 1980 and for the first six months of 1981. Prior to July 1, 1981 and prior to July 1 each year thereafter, the controller shall review the experience accumulated in the account of the State of New Jersey and establish a rate for the next following fiscal year which, in combination with worker contributions, will produce sufficient revenue to keep the account in balance; except that the rate so established shall not be less than 1/10 of 1%. Such contributions shall become due and be paid by the employer to the controller for the State disability benefits fund as established by law, in accordance with such regulations as may be prescribed, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in his employ. In the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to $0.005 or more, in which case it shall be increased to $0.01. (2)   During the continuance of coverage of a worker by an approved private plan of disability benefits under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," the employer shall be exempt from the contributions required by paragraph (1) above with respect to wages paid to such worker. (3)  (A)  The rates of contribution as specified in paragraph (1) above shall be subject to modification as provided herein with respect to employer contributions due on and after July 1, 1951. (B)  A separate disability benefits account shall be maintained for each employer required to contribute to the State disability benefits fund and such account shall be credited with contributions deposited in and credited to such fund with respect to employment occurring on and after January 1, 1949. Each employer's account shall be credited with all contributions paid on or before January 31 of any calendar year on his own behalf and on behalf of individuals in his service with respect to employment occurring in preceding calendar years; provided, however, that if January 31 of any calendar year falls on a Saturday or Sunday an employer's account shall be credited as of January 31 of such calendar year with all the contributions which he has paid on or before the next succeeding day which is not a Saturday or Sunday. But nothing in this act shall be construed to grant any employer or individuals in his service prior claims or rights to the amounts paid by him to the fund either on his own behalf or on behalf of such individuals. Benefits paid to any covered individual in accordance with Article III of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law" on or before December 31 of any calendar year with respect to disability in such calendar year and in preceding calendar years shall be charged against the account of the employer by whom such individual was employed at the commencement of such disability or by whom he was last employed, if out of employment. (C)  The controller may prescribe regulations for the establishment, maintenance, and dissolution of joint accounts by two or more employers, and shall, in accordance with such regulations and upon application by two or more employers to establish such an account, or to merge their several individual accounts in a joint account, maintain such joint account as if it constituted a single employer's account. (D)  Prior to July 1 of each calendar year, the controller shall make a preliminary determination of the rate of contribution for the 12 months commencing on such July 1 for each employer subject to the contribution requirements of this subsection (e). (1)   Such preliminary rate shall be 1/2 of 1% unless on the preceding January 31 of such year such employer shall have been a covered employer who has paid contributions to the State disability benefits fund with respect to employment in the three calendar years immediately preceding such year. (2)   If the minimum requirements in subparagraph (D) (1) above have been fulfilled and the credited contributions exceed the benefits charged by more than $500.00, such preliminary rate shall be as follows: (i)    2/10 of 1% if such excess over $500.00 exceeds 1% but is less than 1 1/4% of his average annual payroll as defined in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.); (ii)   15/100 of 1% if such excess over $500.00 equals or exceeds 1 1/4% but is less than 1 1/2% of his average annual payroll; (iii) 1/10 of 1% if such excess over $500.00 equals or exceeds 1 1/2% of his average annual payroll. (3)   If the minimum requirements in subparagraph (D) (1) above have been fulfilled and the contributions credited exceed the benefits charged but by not more than $500.00 plus 1% of his average annual payroll, or if the benefits charged exceed the contributions credited but by not more than $500.00, the preliminary rate shall be 1/4 of 1%. (4)   If the minimum requirements in subparagraph (D) (1) above have been fulfilled and the benefits charged exceed the contributions credited by more than $500.00, such preliminary rate shall be as follows: (i)    35/100 of 1% if such excess over $500.00 is less than 1/4 of 1% of his average annual payroll; (ii)   45/100 of 1% if such excess over $500.00 equals or exceeds 1/4 of 1% but is less than 1/2 of 1% of his average annual payroll; (iii) 55/100 of 1% if such excess over $500.00 equals or exceeds 1/2 of 1% but is less than 3/4 of 1% of his average annual payroll; (iv) 65/100 of 1% if such excess over $500.00 equals or exceeds 3/4 of 1% but is less than 1% of his average annual payroll; (v)   75/100 of 1% if such excess over $500.00 equals or exceeds 1% of his average annual payroll. (5)   Determination of the preliminary rate as specified in subparagraphs (D)(2), (3) and (4) above shall be subject, however, to the condition that it shall in no event be decreased by more than 1/10 of 1% of wages or increased by more than 2/10 of 1% of wages from the preliminary rate determined for the preceding year in accordance with subparagraph (D) (1), (2), (3) or (4), whichever shall have been applicable. (E)  (1)  Prior to July 1 of each calendar year the controller shall determine the amount of the State disability benefits fund as of December 31 of the preceding calendar year, increased by the contributions paid thereto during January of the current calendar year with respect to employment occurring in the preceding calendar year. If such amount exceeds the net amount withdrawn from the unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 23 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-47) plus the amount at the end of such preceding calendar year of the unemployment disability account as defined in section 22 of said law (C.43:21-46), such excess shall be expressed as a percentage of the wages on which contributions were paid to the State disability benefits fund on or before January 31 with respect to employment in the preceding calendar year. (2)   The controller shall then make a final determination of the rates of contribution for the 12 months commencing July 1 of such year for employers whose preliminary rates are determined as provided in subparagraph (D) hereof, as follows: (i)    If the percentage determined in accordance with subparagraph (E)(1) of this paragraph equals or exceeds 1 1/4%, the final employer rates shall be the preliminary rates determined as provided in subparagraph (D) hereof, except that if the employer's preliminary rate is determined as provided in subparagraph (D)(2) or subparagraph (D)(3) hereof, the final employer rate shall be the preliminary employer rate decreased by such percentage of excess taken to the nearest 5/100 of 1%, but in no case shall such final rate be less than 1/10 of 1%. (ii)   If the percentage determined in accordance with subparagraph (E)(1) of this paragraph equals or exceeds 3/4 of 1% and is less than 1 1/4 of 1%, the final employer rates shall be the preliminary employer rates. (iii) If the percentage determined in accordance with subparagraph (E)(1) of this paragraph is less than 3/4 of 1%, but in excess of 1/4 of 1%, the final employer rates shall be the preliminary employer rates determined as provided in subparagraph (D) hereof increased by the difference between 3/4 of 1% and such percentage taken to the nearest 5/100 of 1%; provided, however, that no such final rate shall be more than 1/4 of 1% in the case of an employer whose preliminary rate is determined as provided in subparagraph (D)(2) hereof, more than 1/2 of 1% in the case of an employer whose preliminary rate is determined as provided in subparagraph (D)(1) and subparagraph (D)(3) hereof, nor more than 3/4 of 1% in the case of an employer whose preliminary rate is determined as provided in subparagraph (D)(4) hereof. (iv)  If the amount of the State disability benefits fund determined as provided in subparagraph (E)(1) of this paragraph is equal to or less than 1/4 of 1%, then the final rate shall be 2/5 of 1% in the case of an employer whose preliminary rate is determined as provided in subparagraph (D)(2) hereof, 7/10 of 1% in the case of an employer whose preliminary rate is determined as provided in subparagraph (D)(1) and subparagraph (D)(3) hereof, and 1.1% in the case of an employer whose preliminary rate is determined as provided in subparagraph (D)(4) hereof. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any determination made by the controller with respect to any 12-month period commencing on July 1, 1970, the final rates for all employers for the period beginning January 1, 1971, shall be as set forth herein. (F)   Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subsection (e), the rate of contribution paid to the State disability benefits fund by each covered employer as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of section 3 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27), shall be determined as if: (i)    No disability benefits have been paid with respect to periods of family temporary disability leave; (ii)   No worker paid any contributions to the State disability benefits fund pursuant to paragraph (1)(G)(ii) of subsection (d) of this section; (iii)  No amounts were transferred from the State disability benefits fund to the "Family Temporary Disability Leave Account" pursuant to paragraph (1)(G)(ii) of subsection (d) of this section; and (iv)  The total amount of benefits paid for periods of disability were not subject to the increases in the weekly benefit rate for those benefits commencing July 1, 2020 pursuant to section 16 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-40). (cf: P.L.2020, c.150, s.2) 6.    R.S.43:21-16 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-16. (a) (1) Whoever makes a false statement or representation, knowing it to be false, or knowingly fails to disclose a material fact, to obtain or increase or attempts to obtain or increase any benefit or other payment under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), or under an employment security law of any other state or of the federal government, either for himself or for any other person, shall be liable to a fine of 25% of the amount fraudulently obtained, to be recovered in an action at law in the name of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey or as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, said fine when recovered shall be immediately deposited in the following manner: 10 percent of the amount fraudulently obtained deposited into the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund, and 15 percent of the amount fraudulently obtained deposited into the unemployment compensation fund; and each such false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact shall constitute a separate offense.  Any penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (2)  For purposes of any unemployment compensation program of the United States, if the department determines that any benefit amount is obtained by an individual due to fraud committed by the individual, the department shall assess a fine on the individual and deposit the recovered fine in the same manner as provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section.  As used in this paragraph, "unemployment compensation program of the United States" means: (A)  Unemployment compensation for federal civilian employees pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 8501 et seq.; (B)  Unemployment compensation for ex-service members pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 8521 et seq.; (C)  Trade readjustment allowances pursuant to 19 U.S.C. 2291-2294; (D)  Disaster unemployment assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 5177(a); (E)  Any federal temporary extension of unemployment compensation; (F)  Any federal program that increases the weekly amount of unemployment compensation payable to individuals; and (G)  Any other federal program providing for the payment of unemployment compensation. (b)  (1)  An employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit or any other person who makes a false statement or representation, knowing it to be false, or who knowingly fails to disclose a material fact, to prevent or reduce the payment of benefits to any individual entitled thereto or to avoid becoming or remaining subject hereto or to avoid or reduce any contribution or other payment required from an employing unit under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), or under an employment security law of any other state or of the federal government, or who willfully fails or refuses to furnish any reports or information required hereunder, including failing to provide the information required by subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-6 immediately upon a separation from employment, or to produce or permit the inspection or copying of records, as required hereunder, shall be liable to a fine of $500, or 25% of any amount fraudulently withheld, whichever is greater, to be recovered in an action at law in the name of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey or as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, said fine when recovered to be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund; and each such false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact, and each day of such failure or refusal shall constitute a separate offense.  Any penalties imposed by this paragraph shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (2) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2022, c.120). (3) Any employing unit, officer or agent of the employing unit, or any other person, determined by the controller to have knowingly violated, or attempted to violate, or advised another person to violate the transfer of employment experience provisions found at R.S.43:21-7 (c)(7), or who otherwise knowingly attempts to obtain a lower rate of contributions by failing to disclose material information, or by making a false statement, or by a misrepresentation of fact, shall be subject to a fine of $5,000 or 25% of the contributions under-reported or attempted to be under-reported, whichever is greater, to be recovered as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, and when recovered to be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund.  For the purposes of this subsection, "knowingly" means having actual knowledge of, or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved. (c)  Any person who shall willfully violate any provision of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) or any rule or regulation thereunder, the violation of which is made unlawful or the observance of which is required under the terms of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), and for which a penalty is neither prescribed herein nor provided by any other applicable statute, shall be liable to a fine of $50.00, to be recovered in an action at law in the name of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey or as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14, said fine when recovered to be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of said fund; and each day such violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate offense. (d)  (1)  When it is determined by a representative or representatives designated by the Director of the Division of Unemployment [and] Insurance or the Division of Temporary Disability Insurance, as appropriate, of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey that any person[, by reason of the knowing, fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation by him, or by anyone acting as his agent, of a material fact,] has received any sum as benefits under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) while any conditions for the receipt of benefits imposed by this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) were not fulfilled in his case, or while he was disqualified from receiving benefits, or while otherwise not entitled to receive such sum as benefits, such person, unless the [director (with the concurrence of the controller) directs otherwise by regulation,] Director of the Division of Unemployment Insurance or the Division of Temporary Disability Insurance, as appropriate, has waived the claimants repayment obligation, pursuant to paragraph (4) or paragraph (5) of this subsection (d), shall be liable to repay those benefits in full.  [The person shall not be liable to repay all or any portion of the overpayment if the representative finds that the person received the overpayment of benefits because of errors or failures to provide information by the employer or errors by the division, and not because of an error, or knowing, fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation, by the person.  If the representative finds that errors made by the person were a cause of the overpayment together with errors of the division, or errors or failures to provide information by the employer, but the person did not make a knowing, fraudulent nondisclosure or misrepresentation, the representative shall determine a portion of the overpayment for which the person is liable taking into consideration possible financial hardship to the person, whether recovery would be against equity and good conscience, and how much the person's errors, compared to errors of the division or employer, contributed to the overpayment occurring, but the amount to which the person shall be liable shall not exceed 50 percent of the overpayment.] The employer's account shall not be charged for the amount of an overpayment of benefits if the overpayment was caused by an error of the division and not by any error of the employer[, but shall be charged if the overpayment was caused by an error or failure to provide information of the employer]. The sum [for which the person is found liable to repay] shall be deducted from any future benefits payable to the individual under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) or shall be paid by the individual to the division for the unemployment compensation fund, and such sum shall be collectible in the manner provided for by law, including, but not limited to, the filing of a certificate of debt with the Clerk of the Superior Court of New Jersey; provided, however, that, except in the event of fraud, no person shall be liable for any such refunds or deductions against future benefits unless so notified before four years have elapsed from the time the benefits in question were paid.  Such person shall be promptly notified of the determination and the reasons therefor.  The person shall be provided a written notification of any determination regarding the repayment of an overpayment and the opportunity to file an appeal of the determination within 20 calendar days after a confirmed receipt of a notice of the determination or 30 calendar days after the notice was mailed to the last known address of the person, and a recovery of an overpayment shall not commence until the end of whichever is applicable of the 20- or 30-day periods and the resolution of any appeal made during those periods. (2)  Interstate and cross-offset of state and federal unemployment benefits.  To the extent permissible under the laws and Constitution of the United States, the commissioner is authorized to enter into or cooperate in arrangements or reciprocal agreements with appropriate and duly authorized agencies of other states or the United States Secretary of Labor, or both, whereby: (A)  Overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-16 shall be recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable under the unemployment compensation law of another state, and overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under the unemployment compensation law of another state shall be recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable under R.S.43:21-1 et seq.; and (B)  Overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under applicable federal law, with respect to benefits or allowances for unemployment provided under a federal program administered by this State under an agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor, shall be recovered by offset from unemployment benefits otherwise payable under R.S.43:21-1 et seq., or any federal program administered by this State, or under the unemployment compensation law of another state or any federal unemployment benefit or allowance program administered by another state under an agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor, if the other state has in effect a reciprocal agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor as authorized by subsection (g) of 42 U.S.C.s.503, and if the United States agrees, as provided in the reciprocal agreement with this State entered into under subsection (g) of 42 U.S.C.s.503, that overpayments of unemployment benefits as determined under subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-16 and overpayments as determined under the unemployment compensation law of another state which has in effect a reciprocal agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor as authorized by subsection (g) of 42 U.S.C.s.503, shall be recovered by offset from benefits or allowances otherwise payable under a federal program administered by this State or another state under an agreement with the United States Secretary of Labor. (3)  The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as requiring or permitting a waiver of the recovery of any overpayments of unemployment benefits if the waiver is prohibited by any federal law, regulation or administrative directive.  A recovery shall not be waived unless the division determines that the claimant is without fault and the repayment would be contrary to equity and good conscience in the case of the recovery of an overpayment of benefit under any of the following programs authorized by the federal "Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act," Pub.L.116-136: Federal Pandemic Unemployment Compensation (FPUC), Pandemic Emergency Unemployment Compensation (PEUC), Mixed Earners Unemployment Compensation (MEUC),  Pandemic Unemployment Assistance (PUA), or the first week of regular Unemployment Compensation that is reimbursed in accordance with Section 2105 of the CARES Act". (4)  Upon request by the claimant, the Director of the Division of Unemployment Insurance or the Division of Temporary Disability Insurance, as appropriate, shall grant the claimant a full waiver of recovery of an overpayment of benefits only after the director has determined that the claimant has not misrepresented or withheld any material fact to obtain benefits and only under the following circumstances: (A)  Where the claimant is deceased; (B)  Where the claimant is disabled and no longer able to work; (C)  Where the claimant received the overpayment of benefits due to an error by the division, or due to an error of the employer or a failure by the employer to provide information; or (D)  Where the director determines that recovery of the overpayment would be contrary to equity and good conscience. (5)   In the event that the Director of the Division of Unemployment Insurance or the Division of Temporary Disability Insurance, as appropriate, becomes aware, without a request from the claimant pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of this subsection (d), that the claimant received an overpayment of benefits due to an error by the division, or due to an error of the employer or a failure by the employer to provide information, the director shall grant a full waiver of recovery of an overpayment of benefits, provided that the director has first determined that the claimant did not misrepresent or withhold any material fact to obtain benefits. (e)  (1)  Any employing unit, or any officer or agent of an employing unit, which officer or agent is directly or indirectly responsible for collecting, truthfully accounting for, remitting when payable any contribution, or filing or causing to be filed any report or statement required by this chapter, or employer, or person failing to remit, when payable, any employer contributions, or worker contributions (if withheld or deducted), or the amount of such worker contributions (if not withheld or deducted), or filing or causing to be filed with the controller or the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey, any false or fraudulent report or statement, and any person who aids or abets an employing unit, employer, or any person in the preparation or filing of any false or fraudulent report or statement with intent to defraud the State of New Jersey or an employment security agency of any other state or of the federal government, or with intent to evade the payment of any contributions, interest or penalties, or any part thereof, which shall be due under the provisions of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), shall be liable for each offense upon conviction before any Superior Court or municipal court, to a fine not to exceed $1,000.00 or by imprisonment for a term not to exceed 90 days, or both, at the discretion of the court.  The fine upon conviction shall be payable to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund.  Any penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (2)  Any employing unit, officer or agent of the employing unit, or any other person, who knowingly violates, or attempts to violate, or advise another person to violate the transfer of employment experience provisions found at R.S.43:21-7 (c)(7) shall be, upon conviction before any Superior Court or municipal court, guilty of a crime of the fourth degree.  For the purposes of this subsection, "knowingly" means having actual knowledge of, or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved. (f)  Any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit or any other person who aids and abets any person to obtain any sum of benefits under this chapter to which he is not entitled, or a larger amount as benefits than that to which he is justly entitled, shall be liable for each offense upon conviction before any Superior Court or municipal court, to a fine not to exceed $1,000.00 or by imprisonment for a term not to exceed 90 days, or both, at the discretion of the court.  The fine upon conviction shall be payable to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund.  Any penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (g)  There shall be created in the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey an investigative staff for the purpose of investigating violations referred to in this section and enforcing the provisions thereof. (h)  An employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit who makes a false statement or representation, knowing it to be false, or who knowingly fails to disclose a material fact, to reduce benefit charges to the employing unit pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-7, shall be liable to a fine of $1,000, to be recovered in an action at law in the name of the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the State of New Jersey or as provided in subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-14.  The fine when recovered shall be paid to the unemployment compensation auxiliary fund for the use of the fund.  Each false statement or representation or failure to disclose a material fact, and each day of that failure or refusal shall constitute a separate offense.  Any penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to those otherwise prescribed in R.S.43:21-1 et seq. (i)  The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall arrange for the electronic receipt of death record notifications from the New Jersey Electronic Death Registration System, pursuant to section 16 of P.L.2003, c.221 (C.26:8-24.1), and establish a verification system to confirm that benefits paid pursuant to the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.), and the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., are not being paid to deceased individuals. (j)  The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall arrange for the electronic receipt of identifying information from the Department of Corrections, pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1976, c.98 (C.30:1B-6), and from the Administrative Office of the Courts and any county which does not provide county inmate incarceration information to the Administrative Office of the Courts, and establish a verification system to confirm that benefits paid pursuant to the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., are not being paid to individuals who are incarcerated. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 270th day following enactment, except that the division shall, prior to the 270th day after enactment, take all administrative measures necessary to implement this act, including making all needed changes in forms and materials to be provided to employers, and notifying them of what is required to be in compliance with this act, including the requirements to provide the division with an email address for communication to and from the division and to use electronic means to communicate with the department. (cf: P.L.2022, c.120, s.2) 7.    R.S.43:21-19 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-19.  Definitions.  As used in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) (1) "Annual payroll" means the total amount of wages paid during a calendar year (regardless of when earned) by an employer for employment. (2) "Average annual payroll" means the average of the annual payrolls of any employer for the last three or five preceding calendar years, whichever average is higher, except that any year or years throughout which an employer has had no "annual payroll" because of military service shall be deleted from the reckoning; the "average annual payroll" in such case is to be determined on the basis of the prior three or five calendar years in each of which the employer had an "annual payroll" in the operation of his business, if the employer resumes his business within 12 months after separation, discharge or release from such service, under conditions other than dishonorable, and makes application to have his "average annual payroll" determined on the basis of such deletion within 12 months after he resumes his business; provided, however, that "average annual payroll" solely for the purposes of paragraph (3) of subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-7 means the average of the annual payrolls of any employer on which he paid contributions to the State disability benefits fund for the last three or five preceding calendar years, whichever average is higher; provided further that only those wages be included on which employer contributions have been paid on or before January 31 (or the next succeeding day if such January 31 is a Saturday or Sunday) immediately preceding the beginning of the 12-month period for which the employer's contribution rate is computed. (b) "Benefits" means the money payments payable to an individual, as provided in this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), with respect to his unemployment. (c) (1) "Base year" with respect to benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 1986, shall mean the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters immediately preceding an individual's benefit year. With respect to a benefit year commencing on or after July 1, 1995, if an individual does not have sufficient qualifying weeks or wages in his base year to qualify for benefits, the individual shall have the option of designating that his base year shall be the "alternative base year," which means the last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the individual's benefit year; except that, with respect to a benefit year commencing on or after October 1, 1995, if the individual also does not have sufficient qualifying weeks or wages in the last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding his benefit year to qualify for benefits, "alternative base year" means the last three completed calendar quarters immediately preceding his benefit year and, of the calendar quarter in which the benefit year commences, the portion of the quarter which occurs before the commencing of the benefit year. The division shall inform the individual of his options under this section as amended by P.L.1995, c.234.  If information regarding weeks and wages for the calendar quarter or quarters immediately preceding the benefit year is not available to the division from the regular quarterly reports of wage information and the division is not able to obtain the information using other means pursuant to State or federal law, the division may base the determination of eligibility for benefits on the affidavit of an individual with respect to weeks and wages for that calendar quarter.  The individual shall furnish payroll documentation, if available, in support of the affidavit.  A determination of benefits based on an alternative base year shall be adjusted when the quarterly report of wage information from the employer is received if that information causes a change in the determination. (2) With respect to a benefit year commencing on or after June 1, 1990 for an individual who immediately preceding the benefit year was subject to a disability compensable under the provisions of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et seq.), "base year" shall mean the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the individual's period of disability, if the employment held by the individual immediately preceding the period of disability is no longer available at the conclusion of that period and the individual files a valid claim for unemployment benefits after the conclusion of that period.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "period of disability" means the period defined as a period of disability by section 3 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27).  An individual who files a claim under the provisions of this paragraph (2) shall not be regarded as having left work voluntarily for the purposes of subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-5. (3) With respect to a benefit year commencing on or after June 1, 1990 for an individual who immediately preceding the benefit year was subject to a disability compensable under the provisions of the workers' compensation law (chapter 15 of Title 34 of the Revised Statutes), "base year" shall mean the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the individual's period of disability, if the period of disability was not longer than two years, if the employment held by the individual immediately preceding the period of disability is no longer available at the conclusion of that period and if the individual files a valid claim for unemployment benefits after the conclusion of that period.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "period of disability" means the period from the time at which the individual becomes unable to work because of the compensable disability until the time that the individual becomes able to resume work and continue work on a permanent basis. An individual who files a claim under the provisions of this paragraph (3) shall not be regarded as having left work voluntarily for the purposes of subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-5. (d) "Benefit year" with respect to any individual means the 364 consecutive calendar days beginning with the day on, or as of, which he first files a valid claim for benefits, and thereafter beginning with the day on, or as of, which the individual next files a valid claim for benefits after the termination of his last preceding benefit year.  Any claim for benefits made in accordance with subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-6 shall be deemed to be a "valid claim" for the purpose of this subsection if (1) he is unemployed for the week in which, or as of which, he files a claim for benefits; and (2) he has fulfilled the conditions imposed by subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-4. (e) (1) "Division" means the Division of Unemployment and Temporary Disability Insurance of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, and any transaction or exercise of authority by the director of the division thereunder, or under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), shall be deemed to be performed by the division. (2) "Controller" means the Office of the Assistant Commissioner for Finance and Controller of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, established by the 1982 Reorganization Plan of the Department of Labor. (f) "Contributions" means the money payments to the State Unemployment Compensation Fund, required by R.S.43:21-7.  "Payments in lieu of contributions" means the money payments to the State Unemployment Compensation Fund by employers electing or required to make payments in lieu of contributions, as provided in section 3 or section 4 of P.L.1971, c.346 (C.43:21-7.2 or 43:21-7.3). (g) "Employing unit" means the State or any of its instrumentalities or any political subdivision thereof or any of its instrumentalities or any instrumentality of more than one of the foregoing or any instrumentality of any of the foregoing and one or more other states or political subdivisions or any individual or type of organization, any partnership, association, trust, estate, joint-stock company, insurance company or corporation, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or successor thereof, or the legal representative of a deceased person, which has or subsequent to January 1, 1936, had in its employ one or more individuals performing services for it within this State.  All individuals performing services within this State for any employing unit which maintains two or more separate establishments within this State shall be deemed to be employed by a single employing unit for all the purposes of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.).  Each individual employed to perform or to assist in performing the work of any agent or employee of an employing unit shall be deemed to be employed by such employing unit for all the purposes of this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), whether such individual was hired or paid directly by such employing unit or by such agent or employee; provided the employing unit had actual or constructive knowledge of the work. (h) "Employer" means: (1) Any employing unit which in either the current or the preceding calendar year paid remuneration for employment in the amount of $1,000.00 or more; (2) Any employing unit (whether or not an employing unit at the time of acquisition) which acquired the organization, trade or business, or substantially all the assets thereof, of another which, at the time of such acquisition, was an employer subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.); (3) Any employing unit which acquired the organization, trade or business, or substantially all the assets thereof, of another employing unit and which, if treated as a single unit with such other employing unit, would be an employer under paragraph (1) of this subsection; (4) Any employing unit which together with one or more other employing units is owned or controlled (by legally enforceable means or otherwise), directly or indirectly by the same interests, or which owns or controls one or more other employing units (by legally enforceable means or otherwise), and which, if treated as a single unit with such other employing unit or interest, would be an employer under paragraph (1) of this subsection; (5) Any employing unit for which service in employment as defined in R.S.43:21-19 (i) (1) (B) (i) is performed after December 31, 1971; and as defined in R.S.43:21-19 (i) (1) (B) (ii) is performed after December 31, 1977; (6) Any employing unit for which service in employment as defined in R.S.43:21-19 (i) (1) (c) is performed after December 31, 1971 and which in either the current or the preceding calendar year paid remuneration for employment in the amount of $1,000.00 or more; (7) Any employing unit not an employer by reason of any other paragraph of this subsection (h) for which, within either the current or preceding calendar year, service is or was performed with respect to which such employing unit is liable for any federal tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund; or which, as a condition for approval of the "unemployment compensation law" for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, is required pursuant to such act to be an employer under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.); (8)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1977, c.307.) (9)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1977, c.307.) (10)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1977, c.307.) (11)  Any employing unit subject to the provisions of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act within either the current or the preceding calendar year, except for employment hereinafter excluded under paragraph (7) of subsection (i) of this section; (12)  Any employing unit for which agricultural labor in employment as defined in R.S.43:21-19 (i) (1) (I) is performed after December 31, 1977; (13)  Any employing unit for which domestic service in employment as defined in R.S.43:21-19 (i) (1) (J) is performed after December 31, 1977; (14)  Any employing unit which having become an employer under the "unemployment compensation law" (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), has not under R.S.43:21-8 ceased to be an employer; or for the effective period of its election pursuant to R.S.43:21-8, any other employing unit which has elected to become fully subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (i)  (1)  "Employment" means: (A)  Any service performed prior to January 1, 1972, which was employment as defined in the "unemployment compensation law" (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) prior to such date, and, subject to the other provisions of this subsection, service performed on or after January 1, 1972, including service in interstate commerce, performed for remuneration or under any contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied. (B)  (i)  Service performed after December 31, 1971 by an individual in the employ of this State or any of its instrumentalities or in the employ of this State and one or more other states or their instrumentalities for a hospital or institution of higher education located in this State, if such service is not excluded from "employment" under paragraph (D) below. (ii)  Service performed after December 31, 1977, in the employ of this State or any of its instrumentalities or any political subdivision thereof or any of its instrumentalities or any instrumentality of more than one of the foregoing or any instrumentality of the foregoing and one or more other states or political subdivisions, if such service is not excluded from "employment" under paragraph (D) below. (C)  Service performed after December 31, 1971 by an individual in the employ of a religious, charitable, educational, or other organization, which is excluded from "employment" as defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, solely by reason of section 3306 (c)(8) of that act, if such service is not excluded from "employment" under paragraph (D) below. (D)  For the purposes of paragraphs (B) and (C), the term "employment" does not apply to services performed (i)  In the employ of (I) a church or convention or association of churches, or (II) an organization, or school which is operated primarily for religious purposes and which is operated, supervised, controlled or principally supported by a church or convention or association of churches; (ii)  By a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church in the exercise of his ministry or by a member of a religious order in the exercise of duties required by such order; (iii)  Prior to January 1, 1978, in the employ of a school which is not an institution of higher education, and after December 31, 1977, in the employ of a governmental entity referred to in R.S.43:21-19 (i)  (1)  (B), if such service is performed by an individual in the exercise of duties (aa)  as an elected official; (bb)  as a member of a legislative body, or a member of the judiciary, of a state or political subdivision; (cc)  as a member of the State National Guard or Air National Guard; (dd)  as an employee serving on a temporary basis in case of fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood or similar emergency; (ee)  in a position which, under or pursuant to the laws of this State, is designated as a major nontenured policy making or advisory position, or a policy making or advisory position, the performance of the duties of which ordinarily does not require more than eight hours per week; or (iv)  By an individual receiving rehabilitation or remunerative work in a facility conducted for the purpose of carrying out a program of rehabilitation of individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age or physical or mental deficiency or injury or providing remunerative work for individuals who because of their impaired physical or mental capacity cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive labor market; (v)  By an individual receiving work-relief or work-training as part of an unemployment work-relief or work-training program assisted in whole or in part by any federal agency or an agency of a state or political subdivision thereof; or (vi)  Prior to January 1, 1978, for a hospital in a State prison or other State correctional institution by an inmate of the prison or correctional institution and after December 31, 1977, by an inmate of a custodial or penal institution. (E)  The term "employment" shall include the services of an individual who is a citizen of the United States, performed outside the United States after December 31, 1971 (except in Canada and in the case of the Virgin Islands, after December 31, 1971) and prior to January 1 of the year following the year in which the U.S. Secretary of Labor approves the unemployment compensation law of the Virgin Islands, under section 3304 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.3304 (a)) in the employ of an American employer (other than the service which is deemed employment under the provisions of R.S.43:21-19 (i) (2) or (5) or the parallel provisions of another state's unemployment compensation law), if (i)  The American employer's principal place of business in the United States is located in this State; or (ii)  The American employer has no place of business in the United States, but (I) the American employer is an individual who is a resident of this State; or (II) the American employer is a corporation which is organized under the laws of this State; or (III) the American employer is a partnership or trust and the number of partners or trustees who are residents of this State is greater than the number who are residents of another state; or (iii)  None of the criteria of divisions (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph (E) is met but the American employer has elected to become an employer subject to the "unemployment compensation law" (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) in this State, or the American employer having failed to elect to become an employer in any state, the individual has filed a claim for benefits, based on such service, under the law of this State; (iv)  An "American employer," for the purposes of this subparagraph (E), means (I) an individual who is a resident of the United States; or (II) a partnership, if two-thirds or more of the partners are residents of the United States; or (III) a trust, if all the trustees are residents of the United States; or (IV) a corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of any state. (F)  Notwithstanding R.S.43:21-19 (i) (2), all service performed after January 1, 1972 by an officer or member of the crew of an American vessel or American aircraft on or in connection with such vessel or aircraft, if the operating office from which the operations of such vessel or aircraft operating within, or within and without, the United States are ordinarily and regularly supervised, managed, directed, and controlled, is within this State. (G)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, service in this State with respect to which the taxes required to be paid under any federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund or which as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act is required to be covered under the "unemployment compensation law" (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (H)   The term "United States" when used in a geographical sense in subsection R.S.43:21-19 (i) includes the states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and, effective on the day after the day on which the U.S. Secretary of Labor approves for the first time under section 3304 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.3304 (a)) an unemployment compensation law submitted to the Secretary by the Virgin Islands for such approval, the Virgin Islands. (I)  (i)  Service performed after December 31, 1977 in agricultural labor in a calendar year for an entity which is an employer as defined in the "unemployment compensation law," (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) as of January 1 of such year; or for an employing unit which (aa)  during any calendar quarter in either the current or the preceding calendar year paid remuneration in cash of $20,000.00 or more for individuals employed in agricultural labor, or (bb)  for some portion of a day in each of 20 different calendar weeks, whether or not such weeks were consecutive, in either the current or the preceding calendar year, employed in agricultural labor 10 or more individuals, regardless of whether they were employed at the same moment in time. (ii)  for the purposes of this subsection any individual who is a member of a crew furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor for any other entity shall be treated as an employee of such crew leader (aa)  if such crew leader holds a certification of registration under the Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Worker Protection Act, Pub.L.97-470 (29 U.S.C. s.1801 et seq.), or P.L.1971, c.192 (C.34:8A-7 et seq.); or substantially all the members of such crew operate or maintain tractors, mechanized harvesting or cropdusting equipment, or any other mechanized equipment, which is provided by such crew leader; and (bb)  if such individual is not an employee of such other person for whom services were performed. (iii)  For the purposes of subparagraph (I) (i) in the case of any individual who is furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor or any other entity and who is not treated as an employee of such crew leader under (I) (ii) (aa)  such other entity and not the crew leader shall be treated as the employer of such individual; and (bb)  such other entity shall be treated as having paid cash remuneration to such individual in an amount equal to the amount of cash remuneration paid to such individual by the crew leader (either on his own behalf or on behalf of such other entity) for the service in agricultural labor performed for such other entity. (iv)  For the purpose of subparagraph (I)(ii), the term "crew leader" means an individual who (aa)  furnishes individuals to perform service in agricultural labor for any other entity; (bb)  pays (either on his own behalf or on behalf of such other entity) the individuals so furnished by him for the service in agricultural labor performed by them; and (cc)  has not entered into a written agreement with such other entity under which such individual is designated as an employee of such other entity. (J)  Domestic service after December 31, 1977 performed in the private home of an employing unit which paid cash remuneration of $1,000.00 or more to one or more individuals for such domestic service in any calendar quarter in the current or preceding calendar year. (2)  The term "employment" shall include an individual's entire service performed within or both within and without this State if: (A)  The service is localized in this State; or (B)  The service is not localized in any state but some of the service is performed in this State, and (i) the base of operations, or, if there is no base of operations, then the place from which such service is directed or controlled, is in this State; or (ii) the base of operations or place from which such service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual's residence is in this State. (3)  Services performed within this State but not covered under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be deemed to be employment subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) if contributions are not required and paid with respect to such services under an unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the federal government. (4)  Services not covered under paragraph (2) of this subsection and performed entirely without this State, with respect to no part of which contributions are required and paid under an unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the federal government, shall be deemed to be employment subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) if the individual performing such services is a resident of this State and the employing unit for whom such services are performed files with the division an election that the entire service of such individual shall be deemed to be employment subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.). (5)  Service shall be deemed to be localized within a state if: (A)  The service is performed entirely within such state; or (B)  The service is performed both within and without such state, but the service performed without such state is incidental to the individual's service within the state; for example, is temporary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated transactions. (6)  Services performed by an individual for remuneration shall be deemed to be employment subject to this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) unless and until it is shown to the satisfaction of the division that: (A)  Such individual has been and will continue to be free from control or direction over the performance of such service, both under his contract of service and in fact; (B)  Such service is either outside the usual course of the business for which such service is performed, or that such service is performed outside of all the places of business of the enterprise for which such service is performed; and (C)  Such individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession or business. (7)  Provided that such services are also exempt under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, or that contributions with respect to such services are not required to be paid into a state unemployment fund as a condition for a tax offset credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, the term "employment" shall not include: (A)  Agricultural labor performed prior to January 1, 1978; and after December 31, 1977, only if performed in a calendar year for an entity which is not an employer as defined in the "unemployment compensation law," (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) as of January 1 of such calendar year; or unless performed for an employing unit which (i)  during a calendar quarter in either the current or the preceding calendar year paid remuneration in cash of $20,000.00 or more to individuals employed in agricultural labor, or (ii)  for some portion of a day in each of 20 different calendar weeks, whether or not such weeks were consecutive, in either the current or the preceding calendar year, employed in agricultural labor 10 or more individuals, regardless of whether they were employed at the same moment in time; (B)  Domestic service in a private home performed prior to January 1, 1978; and after December 31, 1977, unless performed in the private home of an employing unit which paid cash remuneration of $1,000.00 or more to one or more individuals for such domestic service in any calendar quarter in the current or preceding calendar year; (C)  Service performed by an individual in the employ of his son, daughter or spouse, and service performed by a child under the age of 18 in the employ of his father or mother; (D)  Service performed prior to January 1, 1978, in the employ of this State or of any political subdivision thereof or of any instrumentality of this State or its political subdivisions, except as provided in R.S.43:21-19 (i) (1) (B) above, and service in the employ of the South Jersey Port Corporation or its successors; (E)  Service performed in the employ of any other state or its political subdivisions or of an instrumentality of any other state or states or their political subdivisions to the extent that such instrumentality is with respect to such service exempt under the Constitution of the United States from the tax imposed under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, except as provided in R.S.43:21-19 (i) (1) (B) above; (F)  Service performed in the employ of the United States Government or of any instrumentality of the United States exempt under the Constitution of the United States from the contributions imposed by the "unemployment compensation law," except that to the extent that the Congress of the United States shall permit states to require any instrumentalities of the United States to make payments into an unemployment fund under a state unemployment compensation law, all of the provisions of this act shall be applicable to such instrumentalities, and to service performed for such instrumentalities, in the same manner, to the same extent and on the same terms as to all other employers, employing units, individuals and services; provided that if this State shall not be certified for any year by the Secretary of Labor of the United States under section 3304 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.3304), the payments required of such instrumentalities with respect to such year shall be refunded by the division from the fund in the same manner and within the same period as is provided in R.S.43:21-14 (f) with respect to contributions erroneously paid to or collected by the division; (G)  Services performed in the employ of fraternal beneficiary societies, orders, or associations operating under the lodge system or for the exclusive benefit of the members of a fraternity itself operating under the lodge system and providing for the payment of life, sick, accident, or other benefits to the members of such society, order, or association, or their dependents; (H)  Services performed as a member of the board of directors, a board of trustees, a board of managers, or a committee of any bank, building and loan, or savings and loan association, incorporated or organized under the laws of this State or of the United States, where such services do not constitute the principal employment of the individual; (I)  Service with respect to which unemployment insurance is payable under an unemployment insurance program established by an Act of Congress; (J)  Service performed by agents of mutual fund brokers or dealers in the sale of mutual funds or other securities, by agents of insurance companies, exclusive of industrial insurance agents or by agents of investment companies, if the compensation to such agents for such services is wholly on a commission basis; (K)  Services performed by real estate salesmen or brokers who are compensated wholly on a commission basis; (L)  Services performed in the employ of any veterans' organization chartered by Act of Congress or of any auxiliary thereof, no part of the net earnings of which organization, or auxiliary thereof, inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual; (M)  Service performed for or in behalf of the owner or operator of any theater, ballroom, amusement hall or other place of entertainment, not in excess of 10 weeks in any calendar year for the same owner or operator, by any leader or musician of a band or orchestra, commonly called a "name band," entertainer, vaudeville artist, actor, actress, singer or other entertainer; (N)  Services performed after January 1, 1973 by an individual for a labor union organization, known and recognized as a union local, as a member of a committee or committees reimbursed by the union local for time lost from regular employment, or as a part-time officer of a union local and the remuneration for such services is less than $1,000.00 in a calendar year; (O)  Services performed in the sale or distribution of merchandise by home-to-home salespersons or in-the-home demonstrators whose remuneration consists wholly of commissions or commissions and bonuses; (P)  Service performed in the employ of a foreign government, including service as a consular, nondiplomatic representative, or other officer or employee; (Q)  Service performed in the employ of an instrumentality wholly owned by a foreign government if (i) the service is of a character similar to that performed in foreign countries by employees of the United States Government or of an instrumentality thereof, and (ii) the division finds that the United States Secretary of State has certified to the United States Secretary of the Treasury that the foreign government, with respect to whose instrumentality exemption is claimed, grants an equivalent exemption with respect to similar services performed in the foreign country by employees of the United States Government and of instrumentalities thereof; (R)  Service in the employ of an international organization entitled to enjoy the privileges, exemptions and immunities under the International Organizations Immunities Act (22 U.S.C. s.288 et seq.); (S)  Service covered by an election duly approved by an agency charged with the administration of any other state or federal unemployment compensation or employment security law, in accordance with an arrangement pursuant to R.S.43:21-21 during the effective period of such election; (T)  Service performed in the employ of a school, college, or university if such service is performed (i) by a student enrolled at such school, college, or university on a full-time basis in an educational program or completing such educational program leading to a degree at any of the severally recognized levels, or (ii) by the spouse of such a student, if such spouse is advised at the time such spouse commences to perform such service that (I) the employment of such spouse to perform such service is provided under a program to provide financial assistance to such student by such school, college, or university, and (II) such employment will not be covered by any program of unemployment insurance; (U)  Service performed by an individual who is enrolled at a nonprofit or public educational institution which normally maintains a regular faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly organized body of students in attendance at the place where its educational activities are carried on, as a student in a full-time program, taken for credit at such institution, which combines academic instruction with work experience, if such service is an integral part of such program, and such institution has so certified to the employer, except that this subparagraph shall not apply to service performed in a program established for or on behalf of an employer or group of employers; (V)  Service performed in the employ of a hospital, if such service is performed by a patient of the hospital; service performed as a student nurse in the employ of a hospital or a nurses' training school by an individual who is enrolled and regularly attending classes in a nurses' training school approved under the laws of this State; (W)  Services performed after the effective date of this amendatory act by agents of mutual benefit associations if the compensation to such agents for such services is wholly on a commission basis; (X)  Services performed by operators of motor vehicles weighing 18,000 pounds or more, licensed for commercial use and used for the highway movement of motor freight, who own their equipment or who lease or finance the purchase of their equipment through an entity which is not owned or controlled directly or indirectly by the entity for which the services were performed and who were compensated by receiving a percentage of the gross revenue generated by the transportation move or by a schedule of payment based on the distance and weight of the transportation move; (Y)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2009, c.211.) (Z)  Services performed, using facilities provided by a travel agent, by a person, commonly known as an outside travel agent, who acts as an independent contractor, is paid on a commission basis, sets his own work schedule and receives no benefits, sick leave, vacation or other leave from the travel agent owning the facilities. (AA)  Services provided by a commercial fisherman whose compensation is comprised solely of a percentage of fish caught or a percentage of the proceeds from the sale of the catch. (8)  If one-half or more of the services in any pay period performed by an individual for an employing unit constitutes employment, all the services of such individual shall be deemed to be employment; but if more than one-half of the service in any pay period performed by an individual for an employing unit does not constitute employment, then none of the service of such individual shall be deemed to be employment.  As used in this paragraph, the term "pay period" means a period of not more than 31 consecutive days for which a payment for service is ordinarily made by an employing unit to individuals in its employ. (9)  Services performed by the owner of a limousine franchise (franchisee) shall not be deemed to be employment subject to the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., with regard to the franchisor if: (A)  The limousine franchisee is incorporated; (B)  The franchisee is subject to regulation by the Interstate Commerce Commission; (C)  The limousine franchise exists pursuant to a written franchise arrangement between the franchisee and the franchisor as defined by section 3 of P.L.1971, c.356 (C.56:10-3); and (D)  The franchisee registers with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development and receives an employer registration number. (10)  Services performed by a legal transcriber, or certified court reporter certified pursuant to P.L.1940, c.175 (C.45:15B-1 et seq.), shall not be deemed to be employment subject to the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., if those services are provided to a third party by the transcriber or reporter who is referred to the third party pursuant to an agreement with another legal transcriber or legal transcription service, or certified court reporter or court reporting service, on a freelance basis, compensation for which is based upon a fee per transcript page, flat attendance fee, or other flat minimum fee, or combination thereof, set forth in the agreement. For purposes of this paragraph (10): "legal transcription service" and "legal transcribing" mean making use, by audio, video or voice recording, of a verbatim record of court proceedings, depositions, other judicial proceedings, meetings of boards, agencies, corporations, or other bodies or groups, and causing that record to be printed in readable form or produced on a computer screen in readable form; and "legal transcriber" means a person who engages in "legal transcribing." (j)  "Employment office" means a free public employment office, or branch thereof operated by this State or maintained as a part of a State-controlled system of public employment offices. (k)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1984, c.24.) (l)  "State" includes, in addition to the states of the United States of America, the District of Columbia, the Virgin Islands and Puerto Rico. (m)  "Unemployment." (1)  An individual shall be deemed "unemployed" for any week during which: (A)  The individual is not engaged in full-time work and with respect to which his remuneration is less than his weekly benefit rate, including any week during which he is on vacation without pay; provided such vacation is not the result of the individual's voluntary action, except that for benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 1984, an officer of a corporation, or a person who has more than a 5% equitable or debt interest in the corporation, whose claim for benefits is based on wages with that corporation shall not be deemed to be unemployed in any week during the individual's term of office or ownership in the corporation; or (B)  The individual is eligible for and receiving a self-employment assistance allowance pursuant to the requirements of P.L.1995, c.394 (C.43:21-67 et al.). (2)  The term "remuneration" with respect to any individual for benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 1961, and as used in this subsection, shall include only that part of the same which in any week exceeds 20% of his weekly benefit rate (fractional parts of a dollar omitted) or $5.00, whichever is the larger, and shall not include any moneys paid to an individual by a county board of elections for work as a board worker on an election day or for work pursuant to subsection d. of section 1 of P.L.2021, c.40 (C.19:15A-1) during the early voting period. (3)  An individual's week of unemployment shall be deemed to commence only after the individual has filed a claim at an unemployment insurance claims office, except as the division may by regulation otherwise prescribe. (n)  "Unemployment compensation administration fund" means the unemployment compensation administration fund established by this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.), from which administrative expenses under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) shall be paid. (o)  "Wages" means remuneration paid by employers for employment.  If a worker receives gratuities regularly in the course of his employment from other than his employer, his "wages" shall also include the gratuities so received, if reported in writing to his employer in accordance with regulations of the division, and if not so reported, his "wages" shall be determined in accordance with the minimum wage rates prescribed under any labor law or regulation of this State or of the United States, or the amount of remuneration actually received by the employee from his employer, whichever is the higher. (p)  "Remuneration" means all compensation for personal services, including commission and bonuses and the cash value of all compensation in any medium other than cash. (q)  "Week" means for benefit years commencing on or after October 1, 1984, the calendar week ending at midnight Saturday, or as the division may by regulation prescribe. (r)  "Calendar quarter" means the period of three consecutive calendar months ending March 31, June 30, September 30, or December 31. (s)  "Investment company" means any company as defined in subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1938, c.322 (C.17:16A-1). (t)  (1)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2001, c.17). (2)  "Base week," commencing on or after January 1, 1996 and before January 1, 2001, means: (A)  Any calendar week during which the individual earned in employment from an employer remuneration not less than an amount which is 20% of the Statewide average weekly remuneration defined in subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-3 which amount shall be adjusted to the next higher multiple of $1.00 if not already a multiple thereof, except that if in any calendar week an individual subject to this subparagraph (A) is in employment with more than one employer, the individual may in that calendar week establish a base week with respect to each of the employers from whom the individual earns remuneration equal to not less than the amount defined in this subparagraph (A) during that week; or (B)  If the individual does not establish in his base year 20 or more base weeks as defined in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (2), any calendar week of an individual's base year during which the individual earned in employment from an employer remuneration not less than an amount 20 times the minimum wage in effect pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4) on October 1 of the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the benefit year commences, which amount shall be adjusted to the next higher multiple of $1.00 if not already a multiple thereof, except that if in any calendar week an individual subject to this subparagraph (B) is in employment with more than one employer, the individual may in that calendar week establish a base week with respect to each of the employers from whom the individual earns remuneration not less than the amount defined in this subparagraph (B) during that week. (3)  "Base week," commencing on or after January 1, 2001, means any calendar week during which the individual earned in employment from an employer remuneration not less than an amount 20 times the minimum wage in effect pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4) on October 1 of the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the benefit year commences, which amount shall be adjusted to the next higher multiple of $1.00 if not already a multiple thereof, except that if in any calendar week an individual subject to this paragraph (3) is in employment with more than one employer, the individual may in that calendar week establish a base week with respect to each of the employers from whom the individual earns remuneration equal to not less than the amount defined in this paragraph (3) during that week. (u)  "Average weekly wage" means the amount derived by dividing an individual's total base year wages [received during his base year base weeks (as defined in subsection (t) of this section) from that most recent base year employer with whom he has established at least 20 base weeks, by the number of base weeks in which such wages were earned] by the number of base weeks worked by the individual during the base year; provided that for the purpose of computing the average weekly wage, the maximum number of base weeks used in the divisor shall be 52.  In the event that such claimant had no employer in his base year with whom he had established at least 20 base weeks, then such individual's average weekly wage shall be computed as if all of his base week wages were received from one employer and as if all his base weeks of employment had been performed in the employ of one employer. For the purpose of computing the average weekly wage, the monetary alternative in subparagraph (B) of [paragraph (2)] paragraph (4) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subsection (e) of R.S.43:21-4 shall only apply in those instances where the individual did not have at least 20 base weeks in the base year.  [For benefit years commencing on or after July 1, 1986, "average weekly wage" means the amount derived by dividing an individual's total base year wages by the number of base weeks worked by the individual during the base year; provided that for the purpose of computing the average weekly wage, the maximum number of base weeks used in the divisor shall be 52.] (v)  "Initial determination" means, subject to the provisions of R.S.43:21-6(b)(2) and (3), a determination of benefit rights as measured by an eligible individual's base year employment with a single employer covering all periods of employment with that employer during the base year. (w)  "Last date of employment" means the last calendar day in the base year of an individual on which he performed services in employment for a given employer. (x)  "Most recent base year employer" means that employer with whom the individual most recently, in point of time, performed service in employment in the base year. (y)  (1)  "Educational institution" means any public or other nonprofit institution (including an institution of higher education): (A)  In which participants, trainees, or students are offered an organized course of study or training designed to transfer to them knowledge, skills, information, doctrines, attitudes or abilities from, by or under the guidance of an instructor or teacher; (B)  Which is approved, licensed or issued a permit to operate as a school by the State Department of Education or other government agency that is authorized within the State to approve, license or issue a permit for the operation of a school; and (C)  Which offers courses of study or training which may be academic, technical, trade, or preparation for gainful employment in a recognized occupation. (2)  "Institution of higher education" means an educational institution which: (A)  Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate; (B)  Is legally authorized in this State to provide a program of education beyond high school; (C)  Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's or higher degree, or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, a program of post-graduate or post-doctoral studies, or a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and (D)  Is a public or other nonprofit institution. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this subsection, all colleges and universities in this State are institutions of higher education for purposes of this section. (z)  "Hospital" means an institution which has been licensed, certified or approved under the law of this State as a hospital. (cf: P.L.2022, c.71, s.4) 8.    Section 2 of P.L.1981, c.90 (C.43:21-24.19) is amended to read as follows: 2.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 6 of P.L.1970, c. 324 (C. 43:21-24.12) an individual shall be ineligible for payment of extended benefits for any week of unemployment in his eligibility period if it is determined during such period: (1)  The individual failed to accept any offer of suitable work as defined in  paragraph c. or failed to apply for any suitable work to which the individual  was referred to by the employment service or the director; or (2)  The individual failed to actively engage in seeking work as prescribed under paragraph e. b.  Any individual who has been found ineligible for extended benefits by reason of the provisions in paragraph a. of this section shall also be denied benefits beginning with the first day of the week following the week in which the failure occurred and until the individual has been employed in each of 4 subsequent weeks (whether or not consecutive) and has earned remuneration equal  to not less than 4 times the individual's weekly extended benefit rate. c.  For purposes of this section the term suitable work means, with respect  to any individual, any work which is within such individual's capabilities;   this work shall be held to be suitable only: (1)  If the gross average weekly remuneration payable for the work exceeds the sum of:  the individual's weekly extended benefit rate as determined under section 8 of P.L.1970, c. 324 (C. 43:21-24.14), plus the amount, if any, of supplemental unemployment benefits (as defined in Section 501(c)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954) payable to the individual for the respective week; (2)  If the position pays wages not less than the higher of (a)  The minimum wage provided by Section 6(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. s. 206), without regard to any exemption; or (b)  The applicable state or local minimum wage; (3)  Provided, however, that no individual shall be denied extended benefits  for failure to accept an offer of or apply for any job which meets the  definition of suitable work as described above if: (a)  The position was not offered to the individual in writing or was not listed with the employment service; (b)  The failure could not result in a denial of benefits under the definition of suitable work for regular benefits as provided under subsection (c) of R.S. 43:21-5 to the extent that the criteria of suitability in that section are not inconsistent with the provisions of this paragraph c.; (c)  The individual furnishes satisfactory evidence to the division that his prospects for obtaining work in his customary occupation within a reasonably short period are good.  If the evidence is deemed satisfactory for this purpose, the determination of whether any work is suitable with respect to the individual shall be made in accordance with the definition of suitable work for regular benefit claimants as provided under subsection (c) of R.S. 43:21-5 without regard to the definition specified by this paragraph c. d.  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 6 of P.L.1970, c. 324 (C. 43:21-24.12) to the contrary, no work shall be deemed to be suitable work for an individual which does not accord with the labor standard provisions required  by Section 3304(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 and subsection (c)  of R.S. 43:21-5. e.  For the purposes of subparagraph (2) of paragraph a. of this section, an  individual shall be treated as actively engaged in seeking work during any week  if (1)  The individual has engaged in a systematic and sustained effort to obtain work during the week, and (2)  The individual furnishes tangible evidence that he has engaged in this effort during the week. f.  The employment service shall refer any claimant entitled to extended benefits under this act to any suitable work which meets the criteria prescribed in paragraph c. g.  An individual who has been disqualified for regular benefits under the provisions of subsection (b) or (c) of R.S. 43:21-5 will not meet the eligibility requirements for the payment of extended benefits unless the individual has [had employment subsequent to the effective date of disqualification for regular benefits and has earned in employment remuneration  equal to not less than four times the individual's weekly benefit rate] completed the period of disqualification under subsection (b) or (c) of R.S. 43:21-5, and would otherwise be eligible for the payment of extended benefits. h.  (1)  An individual claiming extended benefits who is an exhaustee, as defined under paragraph j. of section 5 of P.L.1970, c. 324 (C. 43:21-24.11), and who is subsequently discharged or suspended for misconduct connected with his work as provided in subsection (b) of R.S. 43:21-5, shall be disqualified for extended benefits for the week in which the separation occurs and for each week thereafter until he has earned in employment remuneration equal to at least four times his weekly extended benefit rate, notwithstanding the disqualifying period for regular benefits for misconduct imposed under the provisions of subsection (b) of R.S. 43:21-5. (2)  An individual claiming extended benefits who is an exhaustee, as defined under paragraph j. of section 5 of P.L.1970, c. 324 (C. 43:21-24.11), but has satisfied the requirements of subparagraph c.(3)(c) of this section concerning  prospects for employment, and who subsequently fails without good cause either to apply for available, suitable work when so directed by the employment office  or the director or to accept suitable work as defined in subsection (c) of R.S.  43:21-5 when offered to him, or to return to his customary self-employment when directed by the director, shall be disqualified for extended benefits.  The  disqualification shall be only for the week in which the refusal occurs and for  each week thereafter, until he has earned in employment remuneration equal to  at least four times his weekly extended benefit rate, notwithstanding the  disqualifying period for regular benefits for the refusal normally imposed  under the provisions of subsection (c) of R.S. 43:21-5 or the disqualification  imposed in paragraph b. of this section for individuals who have not satisfied  the requirements of subparagraph c.(3)(c) of this section. (cf: P.L.1982, c.144, s.5) 9.    This act shall take effect immediately, except that sections 4 and 6 of this act shall be effective retroactively to July 31, 2023.